North Carolina, session 2025, SB857.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. UPDATE FUNERAL BOARD STATUTES
SECTION 1. The catch line to G.S. 90-210.22 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.22. Required meetings of the Board.Board of Funeral Service."
SECTION 2. G.S. 90-210.19 is recodified as G.S. 90-210.22(b).
SECTION 3. G.S. 90-210.18A(b), (c), and (d) are recodified as G.S. 90-210.22(a),
(f), and (g), respectively.
SECTION 4. G.S. 90-210.23(b) and (c) are recodified as G.S. 90-210.22(c) and (e),
respectively.
SECTION 5. G.S. 90-210.18A, as amended by Section 3 of this act, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 90-210.18A. Board of Funeral Service created; qualifications; vacancies; removal.State
policy on the practice of funeral service.
(a) The General Assembly declares that the practice of funeral service affects the public
health, safety, and welfare and is subject to regulation and control in the public interest. The
public interest requires that only qualified persons be permitted allowed to practice funeral
service in North Carolina and that the profession merit the confidence of the public. This Article
shall be liberally construed to accomplish these ends.
(b) through (d) Recodified."
SECTION 6. G.S. 90-210.25(c)(3) is recodified as G.S. 90-210.20(22).
SECTION 7. G.S. 90-210.20, as amended by Section 6 of this act, reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.20. Definitions.
Unless a different meaning is required by the context, the The following definitions apply to
this Article and Articles 13D and 13F of this Chapter:
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Advertisement. ‒ The publication, dissemination, circulation circulation, or
placing before the public, or causing directly or indirectly to be made,
published, disseminated disseminated, or placed before the public, any an
announcement or statement in a newspaper, magazine, or other publication,
or in the form of a book, notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, handbill, poster,
bill, sign, placard, card, label label, or tag, or over any radio, television station,
or electronic medium.
(2) Alkaline hydrolysis. ‒ The technical process that reduces dead human bodies
human remains to bone fragments using heat, water, and chemical agents.
(3) Board. ‒ The North Carolina Board of Funeral Service.
*S857-v-4*

(4) Branch establishment. ‒ A funeral establishment that serves as an ancillary
facility to a principal funeral establishment, which is not required to contain a
preparation room pursuant to G.S. 90-210.27A(a).establishment.
(5) Burial. ‒ Includes Interment in any form, cremation and the transportation of
the dead human body as necessary.
(6) Chapel. ‒ A facility separate from the a funeral establishment premises that
meets all of the following requirements:
a. for the Its primary purpose of is the reposing of dead human bodies,
human remains, visitation, funeral ceremony, or memorial service
service.
b. that It is owned, operated, or maintained by a principal funeral
establishment under this Article, and establishment.
c. that It is not staffed on a full-time basis, basis.
d. in which or on the premises of which, there is not displayed any
caskets or other funeral merchandise; in which or on the premises of
which there is not located any business office or preparation room; and
which no owner, operator, employee, or agent thereof represents the
chapel to be a funeral establishment. A Caskets and other funeral
merchandise are not displayed on its premises; however, a funeral
establishment may utilize a chapel use it to make funeral arrangements
and to sell funeral merchandise to the public by photograph or digital
presentation, and to make financial arrangements related to the sale,
provided that such so long as these uses are secondary and incidental
to and do not interfere with the reposing of dead human bodies,
visitation, funeral ceremony, or memorial service.its primary purpose.
e. A business office or preparation room is not located on its premises.
f. No owner, operator, employee, or agent of it represents that it is a
funeral establishment.
(7) Dead human bodies. ‒ Includes The body of a decedent, regardless of its stage
of decomposition, and includes fetuses beyond the second trimester and the
ashes, bone fragments, or human materials produced as a result of cremation
or alkaline hydrolysis.
(8) Embalmer. ‒ Any A person engaged in the practice of embalming.
(9) Embalming. ‒ The preservation and disinfection or attempted preservation
and disinfection of dead human bodies human remains by application of
chemicals externally or internally or both and the practice of restorative art
including the restoration or attempted restoration of the appearance of a dead
human body. Embalming shall human remains. The term does not include the
washing or use of soap and water to cleanse or prepare a dead human body
human remains for disposition by the authorized agents, family, or friends of
the deceased who do so privately without pay or as part of the ritual washing
and preparation of dead human bodies human remains prescribed by religious
practices; provided, that no dead human body shall be handled in a manner
inconsistent with G.S. 130A-395.practices.
(10) Embalming facility. ‒ A facility, other than a funeral establishment, at which
an embalmer or funeral service licensee engages in embalming and in which,
or on the premises of which, there is not displayed any caskets or other funeral
merchandise, and which no owner, operator, employee, or agent represents
the embalming facility to be a funeral establishment or engages in funeral
directing.A facility that is operated by a funeral establishment and meets all
of the following requirements:
Page 2 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

a. It is located on property that is not contiguous with the premises of the
funeral establishment and has a different physical address than the
funeral establishment.
b. An embalmer or a funeral service licensee engages in embalming at
the facility.
c. Caskets and other funeral merchandise are not displayed at the facility.
d. No owner, operator, employee, or agent of the facility represents that
it is a funeral establishment or engages in funeral directing at the
facility.
(11) Embalming fluid. – Any chemicals or substances A chemical or substance
manufactured primarily for use by licensed funeral directors, undertakers or
embalmers, or registered residents a licensed embalmer, funeral service
licensee, or resident trainee in embalming or funeral service to prepare,
disinfect, or preserve, either hypodermically, arterially, or by any other
recognized means, the body of a deceased person human remains for burial,
cremation, reduction, or other final disposition.
(12) Entry-level examination in funeral directing. ‒ An examination recognized by
rule adopted by the Board to assess competency in all of the following
subjects:
a. Funeral arranging and directing.
b. Funeral service marketing and merchandising.
c. Funeral service counseling.
d. Legal and regulatory compliance.
e. Crematory Reduction facility operations.
(13) Funeral directing. ‒ Engaging in the practice of funeral service except
embalming.
(14) Funeral director. ‒ Any A person engaged in the practice of funeral directing.
(15) Funeral establishment. ‒ Every A place or premises with one or more
structures, on a contiguous piece of property, that is devoted to or used in the
care, arrangement arrangement, and preparation for the funeral and final
disposition of dead human bodies and human remains and is maintained for
the convenience of the public in connection with dead human bodies or as the
place for carrying on the practice of funeral service.
(16) Funeral merchandise or funeral supplies. ‒ Any personal property used in
connection with the conduct of funerals or with the transportation and final
disposition of a dead human body, human remains, including caskets, outer
burial containers, cremation caskets, urns, and burial clothing. The term does
not mean mausoleum crypts, pre-installed outer burial containers or
containers, interment receptacles, and columbarium niches niches, or other
services or merchandise at a cemetery regulated by the Cemetery
Commission.
(17) Funeral service. ‒ The Any activity regulated by this Article or Article 13D or
13F of this Chapter. The term includes the following:
a. The aggregate of all funeral service licensees and their duties and
responsibilities in connection with the funeral as an organized,
purposeful, time-limited, flexible, group-centered response to death.
b. The care or disposition of human remains.
c. The preparation of human remains by embalming or otherwise for
transportation, burial, reduction, or other lawful means of final
disposition.
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 3

d. The sale of funeral supplies to the public or any financial arrangements
for the sale of funeral supplies.
(18) Funeral service licensee. ‒ A person who is duly licensed and engaged in the
practice of funeral service.both funeral directing and embalming.
(18a) through (18d) Reserved for future codification purposes.
(18e) Human remains. – The body of a deceased person, including a separate human
fetus, regardless of the length of gestation, or body parts.
(19) Practice of funeral service. ‒ Engaging in the care or disposition of dead
human bodies or in the practice of disinfecting and preparing by embalming
or otherwise dead human bodies for the funeral service, transportation, burial,
cremation, or other lawful means of final disposition, or in the practice of
funeral directing or embalming as presently known, whether under these titles
or designations or otherwise. "Practice of funeral service" also means
engaging in making arrangements for funeral service, selling funeral supplies
to the public or making financial arrangements for the rendering of such
services or the sale of such supplies.funeral service.
(20) Principal funeral establishment. ‒ The A funeral establishment that serves as
the primary or principal business office of a funeral establishment that has
been issued a license by the Board to operate a operates an ancillary branch
funeral establishment establishment, embalming facility, or chapel.
(20a) Reduced human remains. – Human remains after completion of reduction.
(20b) Reduction. – Cremation, alkaline hydrolysis, or any other method of final
disposition of human remains authorized under Article 13F of this Chapter.
(20c) Reduction facility. – A facility that conducts reduction.
(20d) Reduction licensee. – A person licensed under Article 13F of this Chapter.
(21) Resident trainee. ‒ A person who is engaged in preparing to become licensed
for the practice of funeral directing, embalming as a funeral director,
embalmer, or funeral service licensee, is under the personal supervision and
instruction of a person duly licensed for the practice of funeral directing,
embalming as a funeral director, embalmer, or funeral service licensee in the
this State of North Carolina under the provisions of this Chapter, Article, and
who is duly registered as a resident trainee with the Board.
(22) The "transportation Transportation or removal of a dead human body" shall
mean the human remains. – The removal of a dead human body human
remains for a fee from the location of the place of death or discovery of death
or the transportation of the body human remains to or from a medical facility,
funeral establishment or establishment, embalming facility, crematory,
reduction facility, place of final disposition, or place designated by the
Medical Examiner for examination or autopsy of the dead human body.human
remains.
(23) Transportation or removal permit. – A permit authorizing an individual to
engage in the transportation or removal of human remains.
(24) Transportation or removal service permit. – A permit authorizing a business
to engage in the transportation or removal of human remains."
SECTION 8. G.S. 90-210.22, as amended by Sections 1 through 4 of this act, reads
as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.22. Board of Funeral Service.
(a) Creation and Membership. – The North Carolina Board of Funeral Service is created
and shall regulate the practice of funeral service in this State. The Board shall have nine members
as follows:
Page 4 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

(1) Three members appointed by the Governor from nominees recommended by
the North Carolina Funeral Directors Association, Inc. These members shall
be persons licensed under this Article.
(2) Three members appointed by the Governor from nominees recommended by
the Funeral Directors & Morticians Association of North Carolina, Inc. These
members shall be persons licensed under this Article.
(3) One member appointed by the Governor who is licensed under this Article
and who is not affiliated with any funeral service trade association.
(4) One member appointed by the General Assembly, upon the recommendation
of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. This member shall be a person
who is not licensed under this Article or employed by a person who is licensed
under this Article.
(5) One member appointed by the General Assembly, upon the recommendation
of the Speaker of the House of Representatives. This member shall be a person
who is not licensed under this Article or employed by a person who is licensed
under this Article
Members of the Board shall serve staggered three-year terms, ending on December 31 of the
last year of the term or when a successor has been duly appointed, whichever is later. No member
may serve more than two complete consecutive terms.
(b) The members of said Board, before Oath. – Before entering upon their duties,
members of the Board shall take and subscribe to the oath of office prescribed for other State
officers, which said oath officers. The oath shall be administered by a person qualified to
administer such oath it and shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.
(c) Officers. – The Board shall elect from its members a president, a vice-president and
a secretary, no vice-president, and a secretary. No two offices to shall be held by the same person.
The president and vice-president president, vice-president, and secretary shall serve for one year
and until their successors shall be are elected and qualified. The Board shall have authority to
may engage adequate staff as deemed necessary to perform its duties.
(d) Meetings. – The Board shall hold at least four meetings in each year. In addition, the
Board may meet as often as the proper and efficient discharge of its duties shall require. requires.
Five members shall constitute a quorum.
(e) Compensation. – The members of the Board shall serve without compensation
provided that such members but shall be reimbursed for their necessary traveling expenses and
the necessary expenses incident to their attendance upon the business of the Board, and in
addition thereto they Board. A member shall also receive per diem and expense reimbursement
as provided in G.S. 93B-5 for every day actually spent by such member upon the business of the
Board. All expenses, salaries salaries, and per diem provided for in this Article shall be paid from
funds received under the provisions of this Article and Articles 13D, 13E, and 13F of this Chapter
and shall in no manner be an expense to the State.
(f) Vacancies. – A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment,
except that all unexpired terms of Board members appointed by the General Assembly shall be
filled in accordance with G.S. 120-122. Appointees to fill vacancies shall serve the remainder of
the unexpired term and until their successors have been duly appointed and qualified.
(g) Removal. – The Board may remove any of its members for neglect of duty,
incompetence, or unprofessional conduct. A member subject to disciplinary proceedings as a
licensee shall be disqualified from participating in the official business of the Board until the
charges have been resolved."
SECTION 9. G.S. 90-210.23, as amended by Sections 4 and 18 of this act, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 90-210.23. Powers and duties of the Board.
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 5

(a) The Board is authorized to adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations for
transaction of its business and for the carrying out and enforcement of the provisions of this
Article as may be necessary and as are consistent with the laws of this State and of the United
States.
(b), (c) Recodified.
(d) Every person licensed by the Board and every resident trainee shall furnish all
information required by the Board reasonably relevant to the practice of the profession or
business for which the person is a licensee or resident trainee. Every funeral service establishment
and its records and every place of business where the practice of funeral service or embalming is
carried on and its records shall be subject to inspection by the Board during normal hours of
operation and periods shortly before or after normal hours of operation and shall furnish all
information required by the Board reasonably relevant to the business therein conducted. Every
licensee, permit holder, resident trainee, embalming facility, funeral establishment, crematory,
and alkaline hydrolysis licensee shall provide the Board with a current post-office address which
shall be placed on the appropriate register and all notices required by law or by any rule or
regulation of the Board to be mailed to any licensee, permit holder, resident trainee, embalming
facility, funeral establishment, crematory, or alkaline hydrolysis licensee shall be validly given
when mailed to the address so provided.
(d1) The Board is empowered to hold hearings in accordance with the provisions of this
Article and of Chapter 150B to subpoena witnesses and to administer oaths to or receive the
affirmation of witnesses before the Board.
In any show cause hearing before the Board held under the authority of Chapter 150B of the
General Statutes where the Board imposes discipline against a licensee, the Board may recover
the attorneys' fees and costs associated with holding the hearing against all respondents jointly,
not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(e) The Board is empowered to regulate and inspect, according to law, funeral
establishments, embalming facilities, chapels, crematories, and alkaline hydrolysis licensees,
their operation, and the licenses under which they are operated, and to enforce as provided by
law the rules, regulations, and requirements of the Division of Health Services and of the city,
town, or county in which the funeral establishment, embalming facility, chapel, crematory, or
alkaline hydrolysis licensee is maintained and operated. Any funeral establishment, embalming
facility, chapel, crematory, or alkaline hydrolysis licensee that, upon inspection, is found not to
meet all of the requirements of this Article shall pay a reinspection fee to the Board, as set by
rule adopted by the Board, for each additional inspection that is made to ascertain that the
deficiency or other violation has been corrected. The Board is also empowered to enforce
compliance with the standards set forth in Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. 453 (1984), as
amended from time to time.
(f) The Board may establish, supervise, regulate and control programs for the resident
trainee. It may approve schools of mortuary science or funeral service, graduation from which is
required by this Article as a qualification for the granting of any license, and may establish
essential requirements and standards for such approval of mortuary science or funeral service
schools.
(g) Recodified.
(h) The Board shall adopt a common seal.
(h1) The Board shall have the power to acquire, hold, rent, encumber, alienate, and
otherwise deal with real property in the same manner as a private person or corporation, subject
only to approval of the Governor and the Council of State. Collateral pledged by the Board for
an encumbrance is limited to the assets, income, and revenues of the Board.
(h2) The Board may employ legal counsel and clerical and technical assistance, and fix
the compensation therefor, and incur such other expenses as may be deemed necessary in the
Page 6 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

performance of its duties and the enforcement of the provisions of this Article or as otherwise
required by law and as may be necessary to carry out the powers herein conferred.
(i) The Board may perform such other acts and exercise such other powers and duties as
may be provided elsewhere in this Article or otherwise by law and as may be necessary to carry
out the powers herein conferred.
The Board has the following powers and duties:
(1) To adopt a seal.
(2) To adopt rules to transact its business and to implement and enforce this
Article. Before the Board initiates rulemaking or adopts a rule concerning the
removal, handling, or transportation of human remains, the Board must
consult with the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner. Nothing in this Article
prohibits the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner from adopting policies
and procedures regarding the removal, transportation, or handling of human
remains under the jurisdiction of that office that are more stringent than this
Article or any rules adopted under it.
(3) To employ legal counsel and clerical and technical assistance, fix the
compensation for these services, and incur other expenses the Board considers
necessary to perform its duties.
(4) To supervise and control programs for resident trainees.
(5) To approve schools of mortuary science or funeral service, graduation from
which is required by this Article as a qualification for receiving a license, and
to establish requirements and standards for the approval of a mortuary science
or funeral service school.
(6) To regulate and inspect the operation, equipment, and facilities of any person
required by this Article to have a license, permit, or registration.
(7) To require every person that is issued a license, permit, or registration to
furnish all information requested by the Board that is reasonably relevant to
the practice of the profession or business for which the person is a licensee, a
registered resident trainee, or a permit holder.
(8) To obtain a current post office address from each person issued a license,
permit, or registration under this Article. A notice mailed to a person at the
address the person provided to the Board is validly given.
(9) To enforce compliance with the standards set out in Funeral Industry
Practices, 16 C.F.R. Part 453.
(10) To enforce both of the following, as provided by law and as applied to a
funeral establishment, chapel, embalming facility, reduction facility, or
business engaged in the transportation or removal of human remains:
a. The requirements of the Division of Health Services of the Department
of Health and Human Services.
b. The requirements of a local governmental unit.
(11) To publish the current statutes and rules related to the practice of funeral
service on its website.
(12) To acquire, hold, rent, encumber, alienate, and otherwise deal with real
property in the same manner as a private person or corporation, subject only
to approval of the Governor and the Council of State. Collateral pledged by
the Board for an encumbrance is limited to the assets, income, and revenues
of the Board.
(13) To hold hearings in accordance with this Article and Chapter 150B of the
General Statutes and subpoena witnesses and administer oaths to or receive
the affirmation of witnesses before the Board. In a show cause hearing before
the Board held under Chapter 150B of the General Statutes in which the Board
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 7

imposes discipline against a licensee, the Board may recover its attorneys' fees
and costs associated with holding the hearing against all respondents jointly,
not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(14) To apply to the courts of this State for a restraining order and injunction when
it appears to the Board that a person threatens to violate or is violating this
Article. If the court finds that this Article is being violated or a violation is
threatened, the court shall issue an order restraining and enjoining the
violation. This relief may be granted regardless of whether criminal
prosecution is instituted for the violation. The venue for a restraining order
and injunction is the superior court of (i) any county in which the acts
constituting the violation or threatened violation are alleged to have been
committed, (ii) the county where the defendant in the action resides, or (iii)
Wake County. The Board is entitled to reimbursement of costs and attorneys'
fees if the court finds that the defendant has engaged in the unlicensed practice
of funeral service.
(15) To exercise powers and duties that are conferred by other law or are necessary
to carry out the powers conferred in this Article."
SECTION 10. G.S. 90-210.24 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.24. Inspector.Inspectors and inspections.
(a) The Board may appoint one or more agents who shall serve at the pleasure of the
Board and who shall have the title "Inspector of the North Carolina Board of Funeral Service."
No person is eligible for appointment as inspector unless at the time of the appointment the person
is licensed under this Article as a funeral service licensee.
(b) To determine compliance with the provisions of Articles 13A, 13D, this Article and
Articles 13D and 13F of this Chapter and rules adopted by the Board under this Article, these
Articles, inspectors may do any of the following:
(1) Enter the office or place of business of any funeral service licensee, funeral
director or embalmer in North Carolina, and any office, funeral establishment,
embalming facility, chapel, crematory, or alkaline hydrolysis facility, removal
and transportation business, or person that has a license, permit, or registration
issued under this Article or Article 13D or 13F of this Chapter, any place in
North Carolina where the practice of funeral service or embalming is carried
on, or any place where that practice is advertised as being carried on, or any
place where a visitation, funeral, or memorial service is being conducted or a
body is being embalmed, conducted, or any place where human remains are
being embalmed to inspect the records, office, establishment, or facility, or to
inspect the practice being carried on on, or license or registration to inspect
the license, permit, or registration of any licensee, permit holder, and resident
trainee operating there.
(2) Enter any hospital, nursing home, or other institution from which a dead
human body has human remains have been removed by any person licensed
under this Article a licensee or their the licensee's designated representative to
inspect records pertaining to the removal and its authorization.
(3) May inspect Inspect criminal and probation records of licensees licensees,
permit holders, resident trainees, and applicants for licenses under this Article
licenses, permits, and registrations to obtain evidence of their character.
(4) Inspectors may serve Serve papers and subpoenas issued by the Board or any
office or member thereof under authority of this Article, and shall performa
Board member.
(5) Perform other duties prescribed or ordered by the Board.
Page 8 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

(c) Upon request by the Board, the Attorney General of North Carolina shall provide the
inspectors with appropriate identification cards, signed by the Attorney General or his the
Attorney General's designated agent.
(d) The Board may prescribe an inspection form to be used by the inspectors in
performing their duties.
(e) An inspection shall be conducted during normal hours of operation and periods
shortly before or after normal hours of operation. The person inspected shall furnish all
information required by the Board reasonably relevant to the inspection.
(f) A person that has a license, permit, or registration issued under this Article or Article
13D or 13F of this Chapter that, upon inspection, is found not to meet all of the requirements of
this Article shall pay a reinspection fee to the Board, as set by rules adopted by the Board, for
each additional inspection that is made to ascertain that the deficiency or other violation has been
corrected."
SECTION 11. The catch line to G.S. 90-210.25 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.25. Licensing.Requirements for all applicants."
SECTION 12. G.S. 90-210.25, as amended by this act, reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.25. Requirements for all applicants.
(a) Qualifications, Examinations, Resident Traineeship and Licensure. –An applicant for
a license, permit, or resident traineeship bears the burden of substantiating to the satisfaction of
the Board that the applicant meets the qualifications for the license, permit, or resident
traineeship. An applicant must do all of the following when submitting an application:
(1) Submit the application on a form provided by the Board.
(2) Sign the application under oath, attesting to the accuracy of the application.
(3) Consent to a criminal history background check. If the applicant is a business
entity, any owner, partner, manager, member, operator, or officer of the entity
must also consent to a criminal history background check. Refusal to consent
is grounds to deny the application.
(4) Pay any required fee.
…."
SECTION 13. G.S. 90-210.25(a)(3) is recodified as G.S. 90-210.25D and reads as
rewritten:
"§ 90-210.25D. Qualifications for license to practice as a funeral service licensee.
To be licensed for the An applicant for a license to practice of as a funeral service under this
Article, an applicant for licensure bears the burden of substantiating to the satisfaction of the
Board that the applicant:licensee must meet all of the following requirements:
(1) Is at least 18 years of age.
(2) Is of good moral character.
(3) Possesses an associate degree in mortuary science, or the equivalent, from a
mortuary science program approved by the Board and accredited by the
American Board of Funeral Service Education.
(4) Within the last three years, has completed 12 months of resident traineeship
as a funeral service licensee, pursuant to the procedures and conditions set out
in G.S. 90-210.25(a)(4), G.S. 90-210.25L, either before or after satisfying the
educational requirement under sub-subdivision c. of this
subdivision.subdivision (3) of this section.
(5) Within the last five years, has passed an oral or written funeral service
examination on the following subjects:
a. Entry-level examination in funeral directing.
b. Embalming, restorative arts, chemistry, pathology, microbiology, and
anatomy.
Repealed by Session Laws 1997-399, s. 7.
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 9

c. Examination of the laws of North Carolina, the standards set forth in
Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. § 453 (1984), pursuant to its
most recent version, Part 453, and rules of the Board and other
agencies dealing with the care, transportation transportation, and
disposition of dead human bodies.human remains.
Has paid all applicable fees."
SECTION 14. G.S. 90-210.25(a)(1) and (a)(3a) are recodified as
G.S. 90-210.25E(a) and (b), respectively. G.S. 90-210.25E reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.25E. Qualifications for license or provisional license to practice funeral directing.
(a) To be licensed for the License. – An applicant for a license to practice of funeral
directing under this Article, an applicant for licensure bears the burden of substantiating to the
satisfaction of the Board that the applicant:must meet all of the following requirements:
(1) Is at least 18 years of age.
(2) Is of good moral character.
(3) Possesses a degree in mortuary science or has graduated from a Funeral
Director Program, science, or the equivalent, from a program approved by the
Board or accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service
Education.Education, or has graduated from a funeral director program
approved by the Board or accredited by the American Board of Funeral
Service Education.
(4) Within the last three years, has completed 12 months of resident traineeship
as a funeral director, pursuant to the procedures and conditions set out in
G.S. 90-210.25(a)(4), G.S. 90-210.25L, either before or after satisfying the
educational requirement under sub-subdivision c. of this
subdivision.subdivision (3) of this subsection.
(5) Within the last five years, has obtained passing scores on all of the following
examinations:
a. Entry-level examination in funeral directing.
Repealed by Session Laws 1997-399, s. 5.
b. Examination of the laws of North Carolina, the standards set forth in
Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. § 453 (1984), pursuant to its
most recent version, Part 453, and rules of the Board and other
agencies dealing with the care, transportation transportation, and
disposition of dead human bodies.human remains.
c. Examination of pathology.
Has paid all applicable fees.
(b) To be licensed provisionally for the Provisional License. – An applicant for a
provisional license to practice of funeral directing under this Article, an applicant bears the
burden of substantiating to the satisfaction of the Board that the applicant:must meet all of the
following requirements:
Has completed a Board-approved application for a provisional license and
paid an application fee of five hundred dollars ($500.00).
(1) Is at least 18 years of age.
(2) Is of good moral character.
(3) Possesses an undergraduate degree in any field, an Associate of Applied
Science degree in any field, or a diploma in funeral directing from a
Board-approved curriculum at an accredited college of mortuary science.
(4) Has a certified resident traineeship, is eligible for certification as a resident
trainee, or has at least five years of professional experience under the
supervision of a licensed funeral director or funeral service licensee.
Page 10 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

A provisional license issued pursuant to this subsection shall expire on December 31 of each
year and shall not be renewed more than two times. The annual renewal fee for a provisional
license issued pursuant to this subsection is two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00). A provisional
licensee shall complete a minimum of five hours of continuing education each year in accordance
with G.S. 90-210.25(a)(5)d.
If, within three years of first obtaining a provisional license, the provisional licensee
substantiates to the satisfaction of the Board that the provisional licensee has obtained obtains
passing scores on an examination of the laws of North Carolina, the standards set forth in Funeral
Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. § 453 (1984), pursuant to its most recent version, and rules of the
Board and other agencies dealing with the care, transportation, and disposition of dead human
bodies, and a Board-approved entry-level examination in funeral directing, the examinations
required by subdivision (a)(5) of this section, other than the pathology exam, the Board may issue
the provisional licensee a funeral director license subject to the same annual renewal
requirements as for licensees in funeral directing.license."
SECTION 15. G.S. 90-210.25(a2) is recodified as G.S. 90-210.25F and reads as
rewritten:
"§ 90-210.25F. Requirements for practicing as a funeral director or funeral service licensee.
[Certain Exemptions. –] In order to To engage in the practice of funeral directing or funeral
service, such as a funeral director or a funeral service licensee, a licensee must meet one of the
following descriptions:
(1) own, be Owns, is employed by, or is otherwise be an agent of a licensed
funeral establishment; except that such a licensee may practice funeral
directing or funeral service if any of the following apply:establishment that
has a permit issued under this Article.
(1)(2) The licensee is Is employed by a an accredited college of mortuary
science.science and the practices in which the licensee engages are part of a
Board-approved curriculum of mortuary science.
(2) (Repealed effective July 1, 2030) The licensee does all of the following:
a. Maintains all of the licensee's business records at a location made
known to the Board and available for inspection by the Board under
the same terms and conditions as the business records of a licensed
funeral establishment.
b. Complies with rules and regulations imposed on funeral
establishments and the funeral profession that are designed to protect
consumers, to include, but not be limited to, the Federal Trade
Commission's laws and rules requiring General Price Lists and
Statements of Goods and Services.
c. Pays to the Board the funeral establishment license fee required by law
and set by the Board.
d. Obtains and maintains a professional liability insurance policy with
liability limits of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000). Certificates
of professional liability insurance shall be (i) submitted to the Board
within 30 days of the initial registration of the licensee by the Board
and (ii) submitted to the Board upon request. The licensee shall notify
the Board in writing within 30 days of any change in the insurer or any
cancellation or suspension of policy.
e. Submits an affidavit to the Board attesting that he or she owns, or was
being employed by, a funeral establishment directly damaged or
destroyed by Hurricane Helene.
Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude a licensee from arranging
cremations and cremating human remains while employed by a crematory."
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 11

SECTION 16. G.S. 90-210.25(a)(2) and (d1) are recodified as G.S. 90-210.25G(a)
and (b), respectively. G.S. 90-210.25G reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.25G. Qualifications for license to practice embalming; facility registration.
(a) To be licensed for the Qualifications. – An applicant for a license to practice of
embalming under this Article, an applicant for licensure bears the burden of substantiating to the
satisfaction of the Board that the applicant:must meet all of the following requirements:
(1) Is at least 18 years of age.
(2) Is of good moral character.
(3) Possesses an associate degree in mortuary science, or the equivalent, from a
mortuary science program approved by the Board and accredited by the
American Board of Funeral Service Education.
(4) Within the last three years, has completed 12 months of resident traineeship
as an embalmer pursuant to the procedures and conditions set out in
G.S. 90-210.25(a)(4), G.S. 90-210.25L, either before or after satisfying the
educational requirement under sub-subdivision c. of this subdivision.
subdivision (3) of this subsection.
(5) Within the past five years, has passed an oral or written embalmer examination
on the following subjects:
a. Embalming, restorative arts, chemistry, pathology, microbiology, and
anatomy.
Repealed by Session Laws 1997-399, s. 6.
b. Examination of the laws of North Carolina, the standards set forth in
Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. § 453 (1984), pursuant to its
most recent version, Part 453, and rules of the Board and other
agencies dealing with the care, transportation transportation, and
disposition of dead human bodies.human remains.
Has paid all applicable fees.
(b) Embalming Facilities. – An embalmer who engages in embalming at Facility
Registration. – A funeral establishment that operates an embalming facility shall must register
the facility with the Board on forms provided by the Board."
SECTION 17. Article 13A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 90-210.25H. Examinations.
The Board, by rule, may recognize examinations not prepared by the Board as equivalent to
its own examinations. The Board may contract with a third party to administer examinations on
its behalf to applicants for licensure under this Article."
SECTION 18. G.S. 90-210.29(a) and G.S. 90-210.23(g) are recodified as
G.S. 90-210.25I(a) and (b), respectively. G.S. 90-210.25I reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.25I. Mortuary school students and school privileges.
(a) Students. – Students who are enrolled in duly accredited mortuary science colleges in
North Carolina may engage in the practices defined in this Article if the practices are part of their
academic training and if the practices are under the supervision of a licensed instructor of
mortuary science or a licensee designated by the mortuary science college upon registration with
the Board.
(b) Schools School Privileges. – A school for teaching mortuary science which are that
is approved by the Board shall have extended to them has the same privileges as to the use of
bodies human remains for dissecting while teaching as those granted to a medical college in this
State to medical colleges, but such bodies shall be obtained through the same agencies which
provide bodies for medical colleges.State. A school of mortuary science must obtain human
remains for dissecting from the same agencies that provide human remains to medical colleges."
Page 12 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

SECTION 19. G.S. 90-210.25(b)(1) and (b)(3) are recodified as G.S. 90-210.25J(a)
and (b), respectively. G.S. 90-210.25J reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.25J. Applicants licensed in other states; courtesy cards.
(a) Other States. – The Board shall grant licenses to funeral directors, embalmers
embalmers, and funeral service licensees, licensed in other jurisdictions, when it is shown that
the applicant has satisfied all of the following:
(1) The applicant holds an active, valid active license in good standing as a funeral
director, embalmer, or funeral service licensee issued by a jurisdiction that
will reciprocate reciprocates a North Carolina license to practice as a funeral
director, embalmer, or funeral service licensee.
(2) The applicant has demonstrated knowledge of the laws and rules governing
the profession in North Carolina through achieving a passing score on the laws
and rules an exam administered on behalf of the Board.
(3) The applicant has submitted proof of the applicant's good moral character.
(4) The applicant has practiced in the profession for at least three consecutive
years in a jurisdiction that will reciprocate reciprocates a North Carolina
license to practice as a funeral director, embalmer, or funeral service licensee.
(5) The applicant has paid all applicable fees.
Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude any individual from obtaining a license by meeting
the requirements of subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of subsection (a) of this section.
(b) Courtesy Card. – The Board may issue special permits, to be known as courtesy cards,
permitting nonresident funeral directors, embalmers embalmers, and funeral service licensees to
remove bodies human remains from and to arrange and direct funerals and embalm bodies human
remains in this State, but these State. These privileges shall do not include the right to establish
a place of business in or engage generally in the business of funeral directing and embalming in
this State. Except for special permits issued by the Board for teaching continuing education
programs and for work in connection with disasters, no special permits may shall be issued to
nonresident funeral directors, embalmers, and funeral service licensees from states that do not
issue similar courtesy cards to persons licensed in North Carolina pursuant to this Article. The
Board may adopt rules under this subsection to include courtesy card application procedures and
the limited practice of funeral service that may be conducted with a courtesy card."
SECTION 20. G.S. 90-210.25(a)(5)c. and d. are recodified as G.S. 90-210.25K(a),
and G.S. 90-210.25(a)(5)e. and f. are recodified as G.S. 90-210.25K(b) and (c), respectively.
G.S. 90-210.25K reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.25K. Continuing education required of funeral service, funeral director, and
embalmer licensees.
(a) Requirement. – All funeral service, funeral director, and embalmer licensees now or
hereafter licensed in North Carolina shall must take continuing education courses approved by
the Board in subjects relating to the practice of the profession for which they are licensed, to the
end that the benefits of learning and reviewing skills will be utilized and applied to assure proper
service to the public. Completion of the courses is
As a prerequisite to the annual renewal of a license, the license. Each licensee must complete,
during the year immediately preceding renewal, at least five hours of continuing education
courses, of which the Board may require licensees to take up to two hours specified by the Board.
All continuing education courses must be approved by the Board prior to enrollment. courses
approved by the Board before enrollment. The Board may specify two of the five hours. A
licensee who completes more than five hours in a year may carry over a maximum of five hours
as a credit to the following year's renewal requirement. A licensee does not have is not required
to satisfy the continuing education requirement for the calendar year in which the license was
first obtained.
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 13

(b) Waiver. – The Board shall not renew a license unless fulfillment of the continuing
education requirement has been certified to it on a form provided by the Board, but the Board
may waive this the continuing education requirement for renewal in cases of certified illness or
undue hardship or where the for a licensee who lives outside of North Carolina and does not
practice in North Carolina. The Board shall waive the continuing education requirement for the
following licensees:
(1) All licensees Those who were licensed on or before December 31, 2003, and
have been licensed in North Carolina for a continuous period of 25 years or
more.
(2) All licensees Those who are licensed on or after January 1, 2004, who have
been licensed for a continuous period of 25 years or more more, and have
attained the age of 60 years.
(3) All licensees Those who are, at the time of renewal, members of the North
Carolina General Assembly.
(c) Board Courses. – The Board shall cause to be established and offered to the licensees,
each calendar year, at least eight hours of Board-sponsored continuing education courses. The
Board may charge licensees attending these courses a reasonable registration fee not to exceed
fifty dollars ($50.00) in order to meet the expenses thereof of the courses and may also meet
those expenses from other funds received under the provisions of this Article.Article and Articles
13D, 13E, and 13F of this Chapter."
SECTION 21. G.S. 90-210.25(a)(4) is recodified as G.S. 90-210.25L and reads as
rewritten:
"§ 90-210.25L. Resident traineeship for licensure as a funeral service licensee, funeral
director, or embalmer.
(a) A person desiring to Qualifications. – An applicant to become a resident trainee shall
apply to the Board on a form provided by the Board. The application shall state that the
applicantmust apply to the Board and must meet the qualifications set out in this subsection. The
Board must register an applicant who meets the qualifications as a resident trainee. The
qualifications are as follows:
(1) is not less than Is at least 18 years of age,age.
(2) Is of good moral character,character.
(3) and is the Is a graduate of a high school or the equivalent thereof, of a graduate.
(b) and shall Supervisor Identified. – An application must indicate the licensee under
whom the applicant expects to train. A person training to become an embalmer may serve under
the supervision of either a licensed embalmer or a funeral service licensee who is in good standing
with the Board and who has been licensed to practice funeral service or embalming full time for
a minimum of one year. A person training to become a funeral director may serve under the
supervision of either a licensed funeral director or a funeral service licensee who is in good
standing with the Board and who has been licensed to practice funeral service or funeral directing
full time for a minimum of one year. A person training to become a funeral service licensee shall
serve under the supervision of a funeral service licensee who is in good standing with the Board
and who has been licensed to practice funeral service full time for a minimum of one year. The
application must be sustained by oath of the applicant and be accompanied by the appropriate
fee. When the Board is satisfied as to the qualifications of an applicant it shall register the
applicant as a resident trainee.
(c) Supervisor Limitations. – A licensee who supervises a resident trainee must register
with the Board. The registered supervisor for a resident trainee must be employed by and engaged
in practice at a funeral establishment during the period of sponsorship. A registered supervisor
shall not supervise more than two resident trainees at the same time.
(d) Supervisor Affidavits. – Within 30 days of a resident trainee leaving the proctorship
supervision of the licensee under whom the trainee has worked, the licensee shall file with the
Page 14 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

Board affidavits showing the length of time served with the licensee by the trainee and attesting
to the trainee's competencies on a form prescribed by the Board by rule. The affidavits shall be
made a matter of record in the Board's office. The licensee shall deliver copies of the affidavits
to the trainee.
(e) Switching Supervisor. – A person who has not completed the traineeship and wishes
to do so under the supervision of a licensee other than the one with whom he or she initially
registered may reapply to the Board for approval.
(f) Upon payment of the renewal fee, Period of Traineeship. – To satisfy the requirements
for licensure as a funeral service licensee, funeral director, or embalmer, a resident trainee must
serve 12 months as a trainee. The registration of a resident traineeship shall be is renewable for
one year after the date of original registration; registration, but the registration may shall not be
renewed more than two times. The Board shall mail to each registered trainee at the trainee's last
known residential address or email address a notice that the a renewal fee is due and that, if not
paid within 30 days of the notice, the registration will be canceled. A late fee, in addition to the
renewal fee, shall be charged for a late renewal, except that the renewal of the registration of any
resident trainee who is engaged in active service in the Armed Forces of the United States shall
not be charged a late fee. No credit shall be is allowed for the a 12-month period of resident
traineeship that shall have been was completed more than five three years preceding the
examination for a license. However, any a resident trainee to whom G.S. 105-249.2 grants an
extension of time to file a tax return shall be is allowed an extension of time to retain credit equal
to the number of days of active deployment.
(g) Reports. – All registered resident trainees shall electronically report to the Board at
least once every month during traineeship upon forms provided by the Board listing the work
which has been completed during the preceding month of resident traineeship. The Board may
set and collect a late fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) for each work report filed after the
date the report is due. The data contained in the reports shall be certified as correct by the licensee
under whom the trainee has served during the period and by the licensed person who is managing
the funeral service establishment. Each report shall list the following:
(1) For funeral director trainees, the conduct of any funerals during the relevant
time period,period.
(2) For embalming trainees, the embalming of any bodies human remains during
the relevant time period,period.
(3) For funeral service licensee trainees, both of the activities named in 1 and 2
of this subsection, described in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection that
the trainee engaged in during the relevant time period.
(h) Competencies. – To meet the resident traineeship requirements of
G.S. 90-210.25(a)(1), G.S. 90-210.25(a)(2) and G.S. 90-210.25(a)(3) for licensure as a funeral
service licensee, a funeral director, or an embalmer, the following must be shown by the
affidavit(s) affidavits of the licensee(s) licensee under whom the trainee worked:
(1) That For a funeral director trainee, the funeral director trainee has, under the
supervision of the licensed individual, registered as the trainee's supervisor,
licensee, substantially assisted in directing at least 25 funerals during the
resident traineeship,traineeship.
(2) That For an embalmer trainee, the embalmer trainee has, under the supervision
of the licensed individual, registered as the trainee's supervisor, licensee,
substantially assisted in embalming at least 25 bodies during the resident
traineeship,traineeship.
(3) That For a funeral service licensee trainee, the funeral service trainee has,
under the supervision of the licensed individual, registered as the trainee's
supervisor, licensee, substantially assisted in directing at least 25 funerals and,
under the supervision of the licensed individual, registered as the trainee's
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 15

supervisor, substantially assisted in and embalming at least 25 bodies during
the resident traineeship.
(i) Discipline. – The Board may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew the
registration of a resident traineeship for violation of any provision of this Article or place a trainee
on probation for any violation of this Article or rules adopted by the Board. The Board may
determine the length of any suspension, revocation, refusal to issue or renew, or probation and
impose conditions on probation and reinstatement as the Board deems appropriate.
Each registered supervisor for a resident trainee must during the period of sponsorship
be actively employed with a funeral establishment.
Only two resident trainees may register and serve at any one time under any one
person licensed and registered as a resident trainee supervisor under this Article.
j., k. Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 528, s. 4.
(j) Meetings. – Any resident trainee or registered supervisor of a resident trainee shall
meet with the Board upon request.
m. Repealed by Session Laws 2025-76, s. 3.5, effective July 9, 2025."
SECTION 22. G.S. 90-210.25(a1) is recodified as G.S. 90-210.25M and reads as
rewritten:
"§ 90-210.25M. Inactive licensees and trainees.
(a) Inactive Licenses. – Any Licensees. – A person holding a license issued by the Board
for funeral directing, for embalming, or for the practice of funeral service, or any registered
resident trainee as a funeral director, embalmer, or funeral service licensee may apply for an
inactive license in the same category as the active license held. The inactive license is renewable
annually. Continuing education is not required for the renewal of an inactive license. The holder
of an inactive license may shall not engage in any activity requiring an active license. The holder
of an inactive license may apply for an active license in the same category, and the Board shall
issue an active license if the applicant has completed a total number of hours of accredited
continuing education equal to five times the number of years the applicant held the inactive
license. No application fee is required for the reinstatement of an active license pursuant to this
subsection. The holder of an inactive license who returns to active status shall surrender the
inactive license to the Board.
(b) Trainees. – A resident trainee may place his or her traineeship on inactive status by
giving the Board written notice of the trainee's decision to do so. While on inactive status, the
trainee must continue to renew the traineeship annually and pay the renewal fee. Failure to do so
results in termination of the traineeship. The three-year limit on completing a traineeship
continues to run while a trainee is on inactive status. To return to active status, a trainee must
notify the Board by submitting a form provided by the Board."
SECTION 23. The first two sentences of G.S. 90-210.25(d)(1), (d)(2), and (d)(5) are
recodified as G.S. 90-210.25N(a), (b), and (d), respectively. G.S. 90-210.25N reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.25N. Requirement and qualifications for funeral establishment permit.
(a) Requirement. – No person, firm firm, or corporation shall conduct, maintain, manage
manage, or operate a funeral establishment unless a permit for that the establishment has been a
funeral establishment permit issued by the Board and is conspicuously displayed in the
establishment. Board. Each funeral establishment at a specific location shall be deemed to be is
considered a separate entity and shall require requires a separate permit and compliance with the
requirements of this Article.
(b) A permit shall be issued when:Qualifications. – An applicant for a funeral
establishment permit must meet all of the following qualifications:
(1) It is shown that the funeral establishment has in charge a licensed manager as
set forth in this subsection.Satisfy the ownership, naming, and manager
requirements in G.S. 90-210.25O.
Page 16 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

(2) The Board receives Provide the Board a list of the names of all part-time and
full-time licensees to be employed or contracted by the funeral establishment.
(3) It is shown that the funeral establishment satisfies Satisfy the preparation
room, reposing room, and other operational requirements of G.S. 90-210.27A.
The Board receives payment of the permit fee.
(c) Application. – An application for an initial funeral establishment permit must be
submitted to the Board by the person designated in the application as the intended manager of
the funeral establishment. An application for renewal of a funeral establishment permit must be
filed by the manager of the funeral establishment or, if the funeral establishment is operating
within the 30 days allowed under G.S. 90-210.25O, the owner, a partner, a member of the limited
liability company, or an officer of the corporation.
(d) No Transfer. – Funeral establishment permits are not transferable. A new application
for a permit shall be made to the Board at least 30 days prior to a change of ownership of a funeral
establishment occurring due to an acquisition or sale. A change to the legal structure owning a
funeral establishment shall constitute constitutes a change of ownership only when there is a
change of a majority of the funeral establishment's owners, partners, managers, members,
operators, or officers. The death of an owner, partner, manager, member, operator, or officer
holding a majority of the funeral establishment's ownership interests constitutes a change of
ownership; provided that the ownership. The estate of the decedent shall be permitted to may
submit a new application for a permit within 180 days following after the majority owner's death.
For the purposes of this subdivision, a funeral establishment means one or more structures on a
contiguous piece of property."
SECTION 24. G.S. 90-210.27A(e), (f), (g), (i), and the last three sentences of
G.S. 90-210.25(d)(1) are recodified as G.S. 90-210.25O(a), (b)(1), (c), (b)(2), and (d),
respectively. G.S. 90-210.25O reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.25O. Ownership, naming, and management of funeral establishment.
(a) Ownership. – If a funeral establishment is solely owned by a natural person, that
person must be licensed by the Board as a funeral director or a funeral service licensee. If it is
owned by a partnership, at least one partner must be licensed by the Board as a funeral director
or a funeral service licensee. If it is owned by a corporation, the president, vice-president, or the
chairman chair of the board of directors must be licensed by the Board as a funeral director or a
funeral service licensee. If it is owned by a limited liability company, at least one member must
be licensed by the Board as a funeral director or a funeral service licensee. The licensee required
by this subsection must be actively engaged in the operation of the funeral establishment. A
provisional license to practice funeral directing pursuant to G.S. 90-210.25(a)(3a) shall
G.S. 90-210.25E(b) does not qualify as a funeral director's license for the purposes of this
subsection, subsection (d) of G.S. 90-210.25, G.S. 90-210.25N, or Article 13D of this Chapter.
(b) Establishment Name. – A funeral establishment must register the name under which
it operates with the Board and shall not use any name other than its registered name. The name
must comply with all of the following:
(1) If a funeral establishment uses the name includes the name of a living person
in the name under which it does business, an individual, that person individual
must be licensed by the Board as a funeral director or a funeral service
licensee. licensee or must have been the licensee who met the requirements of
subsection (a) or (d) of this section when the Board issued the establishment's
initial permit.
(2) No funeral establishment shall use a misleading name. The name must not be
misleading. Misleading names include, but are not limited to, include names
in the plural form when there is only one funeral establishment, the use of
names of deceased individuals, establishment and the name of a deceased
individual unless the establishment is licensed using the name at the time the
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 17

new application is made, the use of names of individuals not associated with
the establishment, made. A person or entity licensed as a funeral establishment
in compliance with this subdivision may apply for additional funeral
establishment permits using the existing name.
(3) and the use of The name shall not use the words "crematory," "crematorium,"
or "crematory "cremation center" in the name of a funeral establishment that
does not share a facility or other contiguous real property with a crematory
licensee. If an owner of a funeral establishment owns more than one funeral
establishment or chapel, the owner may not use the word "crematory,"
"crematorium," or "cremation center" in the name of more than one of its
funeral establishments; except that each funeral home having a crematory
licensee on the premises may contain the term "crematory," "crematorium,"
or "cremation center" in its name.unless the funeral establishment shares a
facility with or its premises are contiguous with a crematory licensed under
Article 13F of this Chapter.
(c) No Ancillary Entities. – A funeral establishment shall own, operate, or maintain that
owns, operates, or maintains a branch funeral establishment establishment, embalming facility,
or chapel without first having registered the must register its name, location, and ownership with
the Board; or own or maintain a branch funeral establishment or chapel outside of Board. A
branch funeral establishment, embalming facility, or chapel of a funeral establishment must be
located within a radius of 50 miles in a straight line from the funeral establishment.
(d) Manager. – Each funeral establishment shall have in charge a person, known as a
manager, licensed for the practice of as a funeral directing director or funeral service, service
licensee, who shall be permitted to may manage a principal funeral establishment and any branch
funeral establishments establishments, embalming facilities, and chapels registered to it within a
50-mile radius in a straight line. The manager shall be charged with overseeing oversee the daily
operation of the funeral establishment and any branch funeral establishments establishments,
embalming facilities, and chapels registered to the principal funeral establishment. If the manager
leaves the employment of the funeral establishment and is the only licensee employed who is
eligible to serve as manager, the funeral establishment may operate without a manager for a
period not to exceed 30 days so long as: (i) the funeral establishment retains one or more licensees
to perform all services requiring a license under this Article and (ii) the funeral establishment
registers the name of the licensees with the Board."
SECTION 25. G.S. 90-210.27A, as amended by Section 24 of this act, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 90-210.27A. Funeral Operation of funeral establishments.
(a) Every Preparation Room. – A funeral establishment establishment, other than a
branch establishment, shall contain a preparation room which that is strictly private, private and
of suitable size for the embalming of dead bodies. human remains. Each preparation room
shall:shall satisfy all of the following requirements:
(1) Contain one standard type operating table.
(2) Contain facilities for adequate drainage.
(3) Contain sanitary receptacles for the storage of waste and soiled linens.
(4) Contain an instrument sterilizer.
(5) Have wall-to-wall floor covering of tile, concrete, or other material which that
can be easily cleaned.
(6) Be kept in sanitary condition and subject to inspection by the Board or its
agents at all times.
(7) Have a placard or sign on the door indicating that the preparation room is
private.
Page 18 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

(8) Have a proper ventilation or purification system to maintain a nonhazardous
level of airborne contamination.
(9) Contain surgical gloves and clean smocks or gowns for use when embalming
or otherwise preparing remains for disposition.
(10) Contain identification tags for use in accordance with
G.S. 90-210.29A.G.S. 90-210.27C.
(a1) Temporary Exception. – If a funeral establishment is destroyed by fire, weather event,
or other natural disaster, the Board may suspend the requirements of subsections (a) and (c) of
this section, in part or whole, for a period not to exceed two years. To receive an extension of
more than two years from the date of loss, the funeral establishment may petition a court of
competent jurisdiction who, that, upon finding that granting the requested extension would not
negatively affect the public health, safety, and welfare, may grant an additional extension not to
exceed three years from the date of loss or one year from the date of the court's order, whichever
is greater. In addition to remaining in compliance with all applicable other State and local laws,
rules, and regulations of the city or county where the funeral establishment is located, a funeral
establishment operating under a waiver or extension granted under this section shall do all of the
following:
(1) Comply with all rules and regulations imposed on funeral establishments and
the funeral profession designed to protect consumers, including the provisions
of G.S. 90-210.25(d) and the standards set forth in Funeral Industry Practices,
16 C.F.R. § 453, as amended.16 C.F.R. Part 453.
(2) Maintain all of the licensee's business records at a location made known to the
Board and available for inspection by the Board under the same terms and
conditions as the business records of a funeral establishment.
(b) Limited Access. – No one is allowed in the preparation room while a dead human
body is human remains are being prepared except licensees, resident trainees, public officials in
the discharge of their duties, members of the medical profession, officials of the funeral home,
next of kin, or other legally authorized persons.the person authorized, or a person designated in
writing by the person authorized, to arrange final disposition under G.S. 130A-420.
(c) Every Reposing Room. – A funeral establishment shall contain a reposing room for
dead human bodies, human remains that is of suitable size to accommodate a casket and visitors.
(d) Repealed by Session Laws 1997-399, s. 14.
(e) through (g) Recodified.
(h) Compliance. – All public health laws and rules apply to funeral establishments. In
addition, all funeral establishments must comply with all of the standards established by the rules
adopted by the Board.
(i) Recodified.
(j) A funeral establishment will not use any name other than the name by which it is
properly registered with the Board.
(k) Storage. – Human remains shall be stored in a funeral establishment, a licensed
crematory, reduction facility, or an embalming facility at all times when the remains are not in
transit or at a gravesite, church, or other facility or residence for the purpose of a visitation or
funeral service.
(l) Funeral establishments and crematories Refrigeration. – A funeral establishment or
reduction facility shall refrigerate a deceased body unembalmed human remains at a temperature
not greater than 40 degrees Fahrenheit unless final disposition will occur within 24 hours of the
time that the funeral establishment or crematory reduction facility takes custody."
SECTION 26. The second paragraph of G.S. 90-210.25(e) following subdivision (2)
of that subsection is recodified as G.S. 90-210.27B and reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.27B. Funeral establishment to ascertain desires regarding disposal of human
remains.
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 19

No funeral establishment shall accept a dead human body human remains from any a public
officer (excluding the medical examiner), or employee or who is not a medical examiner, from a
public employee, from the official of any an institution, hospital hospital, or nursing home, or
from a physician or any a person having a professional relationship with a decedent, decedent
without having first made due inquiry as to the desires of the persons who have the legal authority
to direct the disposition of the decedent's body. their disposition. If any persons are found, their
authority and directions shall govern the disposal of the remains of the decedent's body human
remains pursuant to G.S. 130A-420. Any A funeral establishment receiving the human remains
in violation of this subsection section shall make no charge for any service in connection with
the human remains prior to delivery of the human remains as stipulated by the persons having
legal authority to direct the disposition of the body. human remains. This section shall does not
prevent any a funeral establishment from charging and being reimbursed for services rendered in
connection with the removal of the remains of any deceased person human remains in case of
accidental or violent death, and death or from rendering necessary professional services required
until the persons having legal authority to direct the disposition of the body human remains have
been notified."
SECTION 27. G.S. 90-210.29A is recodified as G.S. 90-210.27C and reads as
rewritten:
"§ 90-210.27C. Identification of bodies before burial or cremation.reduction.
Upon taking physical custody of a dead human body, any human remains, a licensee under
this Article or Article 13F of this Chapter, or an authorized representative of a licensee, shall
affix on the ankle or wrist of the decedent a durable tag permanently marked with the decedent's
name and date of death. The licensee or the licensee's authorized representative, or the person
otherwise responsible for the final disposition of a dead human body the human remains shall,
prior to before the interment or entombment of the dead body, human remains, affix on the ankle
or wrist of the dead body, decedent, or, if cremated, reduced, on the inside of the temporary
container or urn containing the remains of the dead body, reduced human remains, a tag of
durable, noncorroding material permanently marked with the name of the deceased, the date of
death, the social security number of the deceased, the county and state of death, and the site of
interment or entombment."
SECTION 28. The first paragraph of G.S. 90-210.25(e) following subdivision (2) of
that subsection is recodified as G.S. 90-210.27D and reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.27D. Prohibitions concerning human remains.
(a) No person shall fail to treat human remains with respect at all times, and no person
shall take a photograph or video recording of human remains without the consent of a member
of the deceased's immediate family or next of kin or other authorizing agent.
(b) No licensee shall handle human remains in a manner inconsistent with
G.S. 130A-395. No person licensed under this Article licensee shall remove or cause human
remains to be embalmed a dead human body when he or she has information indicating crime or
violence of any sort in connection with the cause of death, nor shall a dead human body be
cremated, human remains be reduced until permission of the State or county medical examiner
has first been obtained. However, nothing Nothing in this Article shall be construed to alter alters
the duties and authority now vested in the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner."
SECTION 29. G.S. 90-210.25C is recodified as G.S. 90-210.27E.
SECTION 30. The last two paragraphs of G.S. 90-210.25(e) are recodified as
G.S. 90-210.27F and read as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.27F. Disclosure of prices for funeral merchandise and services.
(a) When and where Prices. – When a licensee presents a selection of funeral
merchandise to the public to be used in connection with the service to be provided by the licensee
or by a funeral establishment as licensed under this Article, establishment, a card or brochure
shall be directly associated with each item of merchandise setting forth the price of the service
Page 20 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

using said the merchandise and listing the any services and other merchandise included in the
price, if any. When price. If there are separate prices for the merchandise and services, such the
cards or brochures shall indicate the price of the merchandise and of the items separately priced.
(b) Statement. – At the time funeral arrangements are made and prior to the time of before
rendering the service and providing the merchandise, a funeral director or funeral service licensee
shall give or cause to be given to the person or persons making such the arrangements a written
statement duly signed by a licensee of said the funeral establishment showing the price of the
service as selected and what selected, the services that are included therein, included, the price
of each of the supplemental items of services or merchandise requested, and the amounts
involved for each of the items for which the funeral establishment will advance moneys as an
accommodation to the person making arrangements, insofar as to the extent that any of the above
these items can be specified at that time. If fees charged by a finance company for expediting
payment of life insurance proceeds to the establishment will be passed on to the person or persons
responsible for payment of the funeral expenses, information regarding the fees, including the
their total dollar amount of the fee, amount, shall be disclosed in writing. The statement shall
have printed, typed typed, or stamped on the face a disclosure indicating that the statement is
provided pursuant to the requirements of G.S. 90-210.25(e). this section. The Board may
prescribe other disclosures that a licensee shall give to consumers upon finding that the disclosure
is necessary to protect public health, safety, and welfare."
SECTION 31. G.S. 90-210.25(e1) is recodified as G.S. 90-210.27G and reads as
rewritten:
"§ 90-210.27G. Prohibitions on taking human tissue.
(a) [Taking of Tissue Prohibited. –] No Taking Tissue. – The taking or recovery of human
tissue at a facility licensed pursuant to Article 13A or this Article or Article 13F of this Chapter
by any person for any reason is prohibited. The prohibition does not apply to any of the following:
(1) A licensee under this Article that performs embalming or otherwise prepares
a dead human body human remains in the ordinary course of business.
(2) The Chief Medical Examiner or anyone acting under the Chief Medical
Examiner's authority.
(3) An autopsy technician who takes or recovers tissue from a dead human body
human remains if all of the following apply:
a. The taking or recovery is the subject of an academic research program.
b. The academic research program has appropriate Institutional Review
Board supervision.
c. The academic research program has obtained informed consent of the
donor or the person legally authorized to provide consent.
(b) No licensee under Article 13A or 13F of this Chapter shall permit the taking or
recovery of human tissue from a dead human body in its custody or control for human
transplantation purposes or for research purposes, except that a funeral establishment or person
licensed under this Article may permit an autopsy technician to take or recover tissue at a funeral
establishment pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection. No Compensation for Referrals. –
No licensee facility licensed under Article 13A or 13F this Article or Article 13F of this Chapter
or any of its licensees, agents, or employees shall accept, solicit, or offer to accept any payment,
gratuity, commission, or compensation of any kind for referring potential tissue donors donors,
other than eye donors, to a tissue bank or tissue broker or to an eye bank or eye broker. For
purposes of this subsection, the term "tissue" does not include an eye."
SECTION 32. G.S. 90-210.25(c)(7)a., b., c., and e. are recodified as
G.S. 90-210.27H(a)(1), (3), (4), and (2), respectively. G.S. 90-210.27H reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.27H. Individual permit for transportation and removal of human remains.
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 21

(a) Qualifications. – An individual shall not engage in the transportation or removal of
human remains unless the individual has a transportation and removal permit issued by the Board.
An application for a transportation and removal permit must meet the following qualifications:
(1) Be at least 18 years of age.
(2) Be of good moral character.
(3) Possess and maintain a valid drivers license issued by this State and provide
proof of all the required liability insurance required for the registration of for
any vehicle in which the person the applicant owns and intends to use to
engage in the business of the removal or transportation of a dead human
body.transportation or removal of human remains.
(4) Affirmatively state under oath that the person has Have read and understands
understood the statutes and rules relating to the transportation and removal
and transportation of dead human bodies of human remains and any guidelines
as may be adopted by the Board.
(b) Requirements. – An individual who holds a transportation and removal permit must
comply with both of the following:
(1) Notify the Board of any change in the individual's address within 30 days of
the change.
(2) Before working for more than one business that has a transportation and
removal service permit issued by the Board, notify the Board in writing of the
name and physical address of each of the businesses."
SECTION 33. Article 13A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 90-210.27I. Business permit for transportation and removal of human remains.
A business entity shall not engage in the transportation or removal of human remains unless
the business has a transportation and removal service permit issued by the Board. In conducting
its business, a person that has a transportation and removal service permit must comply with all
of the following:
(1) Notify the Board of the name and home address of each individual the person
employs for the transportation and removal of human remains.
(2) Notify the Board of the make, year, model, and vehicle registration of each
vehicle the person uses in the transportation and removal of human remains.
(3) Conspicuously display its permit in all vehicles used for the transportation or
removal of human remains.
(4) Keep in its employ at all times at least one individual who holds a
transportation and removal permit.
(5) Obtain and maintain a professional liability insurance policy that has a liability
limit of at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) and specifies the
individuals covered by the policy. The person must submit the required
certificate of liability insurance to the Board within 30 days of receiving a
permit and each year when the person renews its permit.
(6) Notify the Board of any change in the information required by this section
within 30 days of the change. Changes requiring notification include a change
in the insurer issuing the policy required under subdivision (5) of this section
or of the suspension or cancellation of that policy."
SECTION 34. G.S. 90-210.25(c)(5) is recodified as G.S. 90-210.27J and reads as
rewritten:
"§ 90-210.27J. Exemptions to permit requirements for the transportation or removal of
human remains.
The following persons shall be exempt from the Exemptions. – The permit requirements of
this section but shall otherwise be subject to subdivision (9) of this subsection and any rules
Page 22 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

relating to the proper handling, care, removal, or transportation of a dead human
body:G.S. 90-210.27H and G.S. 90-210.27I do not apply to the following:
(1) Licensees Individuals licensed under Articles 13A and this Article or Article
13F of this Chapter and their employees.Chapter.
(2) Employees of common carriers.
(3) Except as provided in sub-subdivision (6)c. of this section, employees
Employees of the State and its agencies and employees of local governments
and their agencies.agencies, while acting within the scope of their
employment.
(4) Funeral directors, embalmers, or funeral service licensees licensed in another
state and their employees.
(5) Funeral establishments issued permits under this Article or reduction licensees
licensed under Article 13F of this Chapter.
(6) Individuals exempt under G.S. 90-210.27K(b) from the prohibitions on
transporting or removing human remains."
SECTION 35. G.S. 90-210.25(c)(6) and (c)(9) are recodified as G.S. 90-210.27K(b)
and (a), respectively. G.S. 90-210.27K reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.27K. Prohibitions when transporting or removing human remains.
(a) Prohibitions. – No person shall transport a dead human body or remove human
remains in the open cargo area or passenger area of a vehicle or in any a vehicle in which the
body human remains may be viewed by the public. Any A person transporting or removing or
transporting a dead human body human remains shall either cover do one of the following:
(1) Cover the body, place it upon a stretcher designed for the purpose of
transporting humans or dead human bodies human remains in a vehicle, and
secure such the stretcher in the vehicle used for transportation, or shall
transportation.
(2) enclose Enclose the body human remains in a casket or container designed for
common carrier transportation, transportation and secure the casket or
container in the vehicle used for transportation. No person shall fail to treat a
dead human body with respect at all times. No person shall take a photograph
or video recording of a dead human body without the consent of a member of
the deceased's immediate family or next of kin or other authorizing agent.
(b) Exemptions. – The following persons shall be are exempt from this section:
(1) Emergency medical technicians, rescue squad workers, volunteer and paid
firemen, firefighters, and law enforcement officers while acting within the
scope of their employment.
(2) Employees of public or private hospitals, nursing homes, or long-term care
facilities, while handling a dead human body human remains within such the
facility or while acting within the scope of their employment.
(3) State and county medical examiners and their investigators.
(4) Any An individual transporting cremated reduced human remains.
(5) Any An individual transporting or removing a dead human body the human
remains of their his or her immediate family or next of kin."
SECTION 36. Article 13A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 90-210.27L. Issuance and display of licenses, permits, and certificates.
(a) Issuance. – The Board must affix the Board's seal to each license issued to a funeral
service licensee, funeral director, or embalmer, and the president and secretary of the Board must
sign each license. The Board must issue a permit certificate for a business permit issued under
this Article or Article 13D or 13F of this Chapter.
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 23

(b) Display. – A funeral establishment must conspicuously display its funeral
establishment permit and the licenses of each funeral service licensee, funeral director, and
embalmer who provides services at the funeral establishment. A business that has a transportation
and removal service permit must conspicuously display the permit in each vehicle used in that
business to transport or remove human remains."
SECTION 37. G.S. 90-210.25(a)(5)b. is recodified as G.S. 90-210.27M(c).
G.S. 90-210.27M reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.27M. Expiration and renewal of licenses and permits.
(a) Expiration and Renewal Application. – A license or permit issued under this Article
expires on December 31 of each year. The holder of a license or permit must submit an
application to renew the license or permit on a form provided by the Board and must pay the
applicable renewal fee. An application for renewal of a funeral establishment permit must be
submitted by the manager of the establishment or, if the establishment is temporarily operating
without a manager in accordance with G.S. 90-210.25O(b), by an individual who has an
ownership interest in the establishment or is an officer of an entity that has an ownership interest
in the establishment. The expiration date may be changed by unanimous consent of the Board
and upon 90 days' written notice of the change to all persons that have a license or permit issued
under this Article.
(b) Deadline for License Renewal. – An application for renewal of a license must be
received by the Board by February 1 following expiration of the license. A person who does not
submit a renewal application by this deadline is considered to have forfeited the license as of the
deadline. The Board shall not accept an application for renewal of a license received after the
deadline.
(c) Reinstatement After License Forfeiture. – The holder of any a license issued by the
Board who shall fail fails to renew the same on or it before February 1 of the calendar year for
which the license is to be renewed shall have forfeited and surrendered after it expires may ask
the Board to reinstate the license as of that date. No license forfeited or surrendered pursuant to
the preceding sentence shall be reinstated by the Board unless it is shown to the Board that:the
date of forfeiture. The Board must reinstate the forfeited license if the Board finds that either of
the following applies:
(1) The applicant has, throughout the period of forfeiture, engaged full time in
another state of the United States or the District of Columbia in the practice
to which the applicant's North Carolina license applies and has completed for
each such year of the period of forfeiture continuing education substantially
equivalent in the opinion of the Board to that required of North Carolina
licensees; orlicensees.
(2) The applicant has completed in North Carolina a total number of hours of
accredited continuing education computed by multiplying five times the
number of years of forfeiture.
No When reinstating a license under this subsection, no additional resident traineeship shall
be is required. The An applicant shall be required to whose license is reinstated under this
subsection must pay all delinquent annual renewal fees incurred for all years since expiration of
licensure and a reinstatement fee set forth in G.S. 90-210.28. The Board may waive the
provisions requirements of this section subsection for an applicant for a whose forfeiture which
occurred during the applicant's service in the Armed Forces of the United States provided if the
applicant applies within six months following severance therefrom.from the Armed Forces.
(d) Deadline for Permit Renewal. – An application for renewal of a permit must be
received by the Board by June 30 following expiration of the permit. The Board shall not accept
an application for renewal of a permit received after the deadline. If the Board receives an
application for renewal of a permit after February 1 but before July 1, the application is subject
to a late renewal fee in addition to the regular renewal fee."
Page 24 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

SECTION 38. G.S. 90-210.28 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.28. Fees.
(a) The Board may set and collect fees, not to exceed the following amounts:
Funeral Establishment and Branch Funeral Establishment permit
Application .................................................. $400.00
Annual renewal ............................................. 250.00
Late renewal .................................................. 150.00
Establishment and embalming facility reinspection fee........ 150.00
Courtesy card
Application .................................................... 100.00
Annual renewal ............................................... 75.00
Out-of-state licensee
Application .................................................... 250.00
Embalmer, funeral director, funeral service
Application
-North North Carolina-Resident .................... 200.00
-Non-Resident Non-Resident ........................ 250.00
Annual Renewal
-Embalmer Embalmer or funeral director ....... 75.00
Total fee, embalmer and funeral director
when both are held by the same person ........ 100.00
-funeral Funeral service................................. 100.00
Inactive Status ................................................. 50.00
Reinstatement fee ............................................ 50.00
Resident trainee permit
Application ...................................................... 50.00
Voluntary change in supervisor ...................... 50.00
Annual renewal ............................................... 35.00
Late renewal .................................................... 25.00
Duplicate license certificate ............................ 25.00
Transportation or removal permit
Application (individual)……………………..200.00
Application (business)……………………….300.00
Annual renewal………………….……………75.00
Late renewal…………………………………100.00
Chapel registration
Application .................................................... 150.00
Annual renewal ............................................. 100.00
Late renewal .................................................... 75.00
Continuing education course
Registration…………………………………...50.00
Work report
Late fee………………………………………..50.00
The Board shall cause to be published the current statutes and rules related to the practice of
funeral service on its website.
(b) The following fees apply to a provisional license to practice funeral directing:
Application…………………………………..$500.00
Annual renewal……………………………….250.00"
SECTION 39. G.S. 90-210.25(e)(1), except for the last paragraph, is recodified as
G.S. 90-210.28A(a). The last paragraph of G.S. 90-210.25(c)(14) is recodified as
G.S. 90-210.28A(b). G.S. 90-210.28A reads as rewritten:
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 25

"§ 90-210.28A. Grounds to refuse to issue or renew a license or permit or to take
disciplinary action.
(a) Whenever Grounds. – When the Board finds that an applicant for a license or a person
to whom a license has been issued by the Board individual applicant, licensee, or permit holder
is guilty of any of the following acts or omissions and the Board also finds that the person
individual has thereby become unfit to practice, the Board may suspend or revoke the license or
permit or refuse to issue or renew the license, license or permit in accordance with the procedures
set out in Chapter 150B of the General Statutes:
(1) Conviction of, or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony or misdemeanor
that indicates that the individual is unfit or incompetent to engage in funeral
service or that the individual has deceived or defrauded the public.
(2) Denial, suspension, or revocation of an occupational or business license by
another jurisdiction.
(3) Fraud or misrepresentation in obtaining or renewing a license or permit or in
the practice of funeral service or operation of a the licensee's or permit holder's
business.
(4) False or misleading advertising as the holder of a license.license or permit.
(5) Solicitation of dead human bodies human remains by the licensee, his
individual, or the individual's agents, assistants, or employees; but this
paragraph shall not be construed to employees. This subdivision does not
prohibit general advertising by the licensee.licensee or permit holder.
(6) Employment directly or indirectly of any a resident trainee agent, assistant
assistant, or other person, on a part-time or full-time basis, or on commission,
for the purpose of calling upon individuals or institutions by whose influence
dead human bodies human remains may be turned over to a particular
licensee.licensee or permit holder.
(7) The payment or offer of payment of a commission by the licensee, his
individual, or the individual's agents, assistants assistants, or employees
employees, for the purpose of securing business except as authorized by
Article 13D of this Chapter.
(8) Acts or omissions indicating that the permittee individual is unable to engage
in funeral service with reasonable skill and safety by reason of illness,
excessive use of alcohol, drugs, chemicals, or any other type of substance, or
by reason of any physical or mental abnormality.disability.
(9) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed a person who does not hold a license or
permit to perform services under this Article, including the use of a picture or
name in connection with advertisements or other written material published
or caused to be published by the licensee.licensee or permit holder.
(10) Failure to treat a dead human body human remains with respect at all times.
(11) Violation of or cooperation with others to violate any of the provisions of this
Article or Articles 13D, 13E, or 13F of this Chapter, any rules and regulations
of the Board, or the standards set forth in Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R.
453 (1984), as amended from time to time.16 C.F.R. Part 453.
(12) Violation of any State law or municipal or county ordinance or regulation
affecting the handling, custody, care care, or transportation of dead human
bodies.human remains.
(13) Refusing to surrender promptly the custody of a dead human body or cremated
remains human remains, including reduced human remains, upon the express
order of the person lawfully entitled to the custody thereof.their custody.
(14) Knowingly making any false statement on a certificate of death or violating
or cooperating with others to violate any provision of Article 4 or 16 of
Page 26 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

Chapter 130A of the General Statutes or any rules or regulations promulgated
under those Articles as amended from time to time.adopted under those
Articles.
(15) Indecent exposure or exhibition of a dead human body human remains while
in the custody or control of a licensee.licensee or permit holder.
(16) Failure to refund any insurance proceeds received as consideration in excess
of the funeral contract purchase price within 30 days of receipt; provided,
however, that this provision shall not be construed to include receipt. This
subdivision does not apply to interest or growth on funds paid toward funeral
goods and services to be provided pursuant to an inflation-proof preneed
contract.
(17) Failure to provide, within a reasonable time, either the goods and services
contracted for or a refund for the price of goods and services paid for but not
fulfilled.
(18) Violation of G.S. 58-58-97.
(19) Failure to respond to the Board's inquiries in a reasonable manner or time
regarding any matter affecting the individual's performance of funeral
services.
(20) Failure to adequately supervise or oversee auxiliary licensed or unlicensed
staff, employees, agents, or contractors as required by this Article or Articles
13D, 13E, or 13F of this Chapter, any rules and regulations adopted by the
Board, or the standards set forth in Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. § 453
(1984), as amended.16 C.F.R. Part 453.
(21) Knowingly failing to follow the lawful direction of the person or persons with
the right to authorize disposition of a dead human body human remains in
accordance with G.S. 130A-420.
(22) Practicing funeral service, funeral directing, or embalming without a license.
(b) Length and Conditions. – The Board shall have the authority to may determine the
length and conditions of any period of revocation, suspension, or refusal to issue or renew, or
probation.renew a license or permit. The Board may require satisfactory completion of remedial
or educational training as a prerequisite to license or permit reinstatement."
SECTION 40. The last paragraph of G.S. 90-210.25(e)(1) is recodified as
G.S. 90-210.28B(a). G.S. 90-210.28B reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.28B. Penalties.
(a) In any case in which Authorization. – If the Board is entitled to suspend, revoke
revoke, or refuse to renew a license, license or permit, the Board may accept from the licensee
or permit holder an offer to pay a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).
The Board may either accept a civil penalty or revoke or refuse to renew a license, license or
permit, but not both.
(b) Fund. – The clear proceeds of civil penalties imposed under this Article shall be
remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with G.S. 115C-457.2."
SECTION 41. G.S. 90-210.25(e)(2) is recodified as G.S. 90-210.28C and reads as
rewritten:
"§ 90-210.28C. Probation.
Where When the Board finds that a licensee or permit holder is guilty of one or more of the
acts or omissions listed in subdivision (e)(1) of this section G.S. 90-210.28A but it is determined
by the Board that the licensee has not thereby become unfit to practice, the Board may place the
licensee or permit holder on a term of probation in accordance with the procedures set out in
Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. In any case in which If the Board is entitled to place a
licensee or permit holder on a term of probation, the Board may also impose a civil penalty of
not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) in conjunction with the probation. The Board may
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 27

also require satisfactory completion of remedial or educational training as a prerequisite to
license reinstatement or for completing the term of probation. The Board shall have the authority
to may determine the length and conditions of any period of suspension, revocation, probation,
or refusal to issue or renew a license.probation."
SECTION 42. G.S. 90-210.25(d)(4) is recodified as G.S. 90-210.28D and reads as
rewritten:
"§ 90-210.28D. Disciplinary action against business permit holder.
The Board may place on probation, refuse to issue or renew, suspend, or revoke a funeral
establishment permit or other business permit when an owner, partner, manager, member,
operator, or officer of the funeral establishment business violates any provision of this Article or
any regulations rule of the Board, or when any an agent or employee of the funeral establishment,
business, with the consent of any a person, firm firm, or corporation operating the funeral
establishment, business, violates any of those provisions, rules or regulations. provision of this
Article or rule of the Board. In any case in which If the Board is entitled to place a funeral
establishment business permittee on a term of probation, the Board may also impose a civil
penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) in conjunction with the probation. In any
case in which If the Board is entitled to suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a permit, the Board
may accept from the funeral establishment business permittee an offer to pay a civil penalty of
not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000). The Board may either accept a civil penalty or
revoke or refuse to renew a license, but not both. Any A civil penalty under this subdivision
section may be in addition to any a civil penalty assessed against one or more licensed individuals
employed by the funeral establishment. business permittee. The Board shall have the authority
to may determine the length and conditions of any period of revocation, suspension, refusal to
issue or renew, or probation."
SECTION 43. G.S. 90-210.25(a)(5)h. is recodified as G.S. 90-210.28E and reads as
rewritten:
"§ 90-210.28E. Procedure for criminal history background check.
(a) All applicants for licensure, including any owner, partner, manager, member,
operator, or officer of a business entity applying for licensure under this Article, shall consent to
a criminal history record check. Refusal to consent to a criminal history record check may
constitute grounds for the Board to deny licensure to an applicant. The Board shall ensure that
the State and national criminal history is checked for any an applicant applying for initial
licensure or for reinstatement of licensure, if such the licensure has been expired for three or
more years. The Department of Public Safety may provide a criminal record check to the Board
for a person who has applied for a new or renewal license, or certification license through the
Board; provided, however, that the Board. The Board and the applicant may consent to the use
of a criminal background check vendor other than the Department of Public Safety, the cost of
which shall be paid by the applicant.
(b) If the Department of Public Safety performs the criminal background check, the
Board shall provide to the Department of Public Safety, along with the request, the fingerprints
of the applicant, any additional information required by the Department of Public Safety, and a
form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal record and to the use of the
fingerprints and other identifying information required by the State or national repositories. The
applicant's fingerprints shall be forwarded to the State Bureau of Investigation for a search of the
State's criminal history record file, and the State Bureau of Investigation shall forward a set of
the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history check. The
Department of Public Safety may charge each applicant a fee for conducting the checks of
criminal history records authorized by this section.
(c) The Board shall keep all information obtained pursuant to this subdivision section
privileged, in accordance with applicable State law and federal guidelines, and federal law, and
the information shall be is confidential and shall not be is not a public record under Chapter 132
Page 28 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

of the General Statutes. The Board, Board and its officers and employees, acting in good faith
and in compliance with this section, shall be are immune from civil liability for denying licensure
to an applicant based on information provided in the applicant's criminal history record check.
The Department of Public Safety may charge each applicant a fee for conducting the checks
of criminal history records authorized by this subdivision."
SECTION 44. G.S. 90-210.29C reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.29C. Unlawful sale of embalming fluid.Misdemeanors and felonies.
(a) Offense. – It is unlawful for a funeral director, embalmer, or resident trainee to
knowingly give, sell, permit to be sold, offer for sale, or display for sale, other than for purposes
within the general scope of their activities as a funeral director, embalmer, or resident trainee,
embalming fluid to another person with actual knowledge that the person is not a funeral director,
embalmer, or resident trainee.
(b) Punishment. – A person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a Class
I felony, including a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) and not more than five
hundred dollars ($500.00).
(a) Practicing Without Authorization. – A person who holds himself or herself out as
practicing as a funeral service licensee, a funeral director, or an embalmer or as operating a
funeral establishment without having complied with this Article commits a Class 2 misdemeanor.
A person who holds himself or herself out as engaging in the business of the transportation or
removal of human remains without having complied with this Article commits a Class 2
misdemeanor.
(b) Abusing Human Remains. – A person who knowingly or willfully abuses or mutilates
human remains in the person's custody commits a Class 2 misdemeanor. It is not a violation of
this subsection for a person licensed under this Article as a funeral service licensee or an
embalmer to embalm human remains consistent with techniques of embalming generally
recognized by funeral service licensees or embalmers. It is not a violation of this subsection for
a person licensed under this Article as a funeral service licensee or a funeral director to exhibit
human remains consistent with instructions from the person authorized to dispose of the human
remains.
(c) Selling Embalming Fluid. – It is unlawful for a funeral director, embalmer, or resident
trainee to knowingly give, sell, allow to be sold, offer for sale, or display for sale, other than for
purposes within the general scope of their activities as a funeral director, embalmer, or resident
trainee, embalming fluid to another person with actual knowledge that the person is not a funeral
director, embalmer, or resident trainee. A person who violates this subsection commits a Class I
felony and is punishable by imprisonment and a fine of not less than one hundred dollars
($100.00) and not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00)."
SECTION 45. All provisions of G.S. 90-210.25 that are not enacted or recodified by
this act are repealed.
SECTION 46. Article 13D of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes reads as rewritten:
"Article 13D.
"Preneed Funeral Funds.
"§ 90-210.60. Definitions.
As used in this Article, unless the context requires otherwise:The following definitions and
the definitions of Article 13A of this Chapter apply in this Article:
(1) Board. ‒ The North Carolina Board of Funeral Service as created pursuant to
Article 13A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.this Chapter.
(1a) Cash advance item. ‒ Any item obtained from a third party and paid for by the
funeral provider on the purchaser's behalf. Cash advance items may include,
but are not limited to, sales tax, certified copies of death certificates, clergy
honoraria, flowers, musicians or singers, obituary notices, and gratuities.
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 29

(2) Financial institution. ‒ A bank, credit union, trust company, savings bank, or
savings and loan association authorized by law to do business in this State.
(3) Insurance company. ‒ Any A corporation, limited liability company,
association, partnership, society, order, individual individual, or aggregation
of individuals engaging in or proposing or attempting to engage as principals
in any kind of insurance business, including the exchanging of reciprocal or
interinsurance contracts between individuals, partnerships, and corporations.
(3a) Legal representative. ‒The person authorized by G.S. 130A-420 who would
be otherwise authorized to dispose of the remains of the preneed funeral
contract beneficiary.
(4) Prearrangement insurance policy. ‒ A life insurance policy, annuity contract,
or other insurance contract, or any series of contracts or agreements in any
form or manner, issued by an insurance company authorized by law to do
business in this State, which, that, whether by assignment or otherwise, has
for a purpose the funding of a preneed funeral contract or an insurance-funded
funeral or burial prearrangement, the insured or annuitant being the person for
whose service the funds were paid.
(5) Preneed funeral contract. ‒ Any A contract, agreement, or mutual
understanding, or any series or combination of contracts, agreements, or
mutual understandings, whether funded by trust deposits or prearrangement
insurance policies, or any combination thereof, which that has for a purpose
the furnishing or performance of funeral services, or the furnishing or delivery
of personal property, merchandise, or services of any nature in connection
with the final disposition of a dead human body, person's human remains, to
be furnished or delivered at a time determinable by the death of the person
whose body is to be disposed of, but person. The term does not mean the
furnishing of a cemetery lot, crypt, niche, mausoleum, outer burial containers,
or pre-installed interment receptacle sold by a cemetery that is regulated by
the Cemetery Commission. The term does not include a transportation
protection agreement.
(6) Preneed funeral contract beneficiary. ‒ The person upon whose death the
preneed funeral contract will be performed; this person may also be the
purchaser of the preneed funeral contract.
(7) Preneed funeral funds. ‒ All payments of cash made to any a person,
partnership, association, corporation, or other entity upon any preneed funeral
contract or any other agreement, contract, or prearrangement insurance policy,
or any series or combination of preneed funeral contracts or any other
agreements, contracts, or prearrangement insurance policies, but excluding
the furnishing of cemetery lots, crypts, niches, mausoleums, outer burial
containers, or pre-installed interment receptacles sold by a cemetery regulated
by the Cemetery Commission, which that have for a purpose or which that by
operation provide for the furnishing or performance of funeral or burial
services, or the furnishing or delivery of personal property, merchandise, or
services of any nature in connection with the final disposition of a dead human
body, human remains, to be furnished or delivered at a time determinable by
the death of the person whose body is human remains are to be disposed of,
or the providing of the proceeds of any an insurance policy for such this use.
(8) Preneed funeral planning. ‒ Offering to sell or selling preneed funeral
contracts, or making other arrangements prior to before death for the
providing of funeral services or merchandise.
Page 30 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

(9) Preneed licensee. ‒A funeral establishment which that has applied for and has
been granted a license to sell preneed funeral contracts under the this Article.
Such This license is also referred to in this Article as a "preneed funeral
establishment license" or "preneed funeral establishment permit."
(10) Transportation protection agreement. ‒ An agreement, sold separately from a
preneed funeral contract, that primarily provides for the coordination and
arranging of all professional services related to the preparation of human
remains or cremated reduced human remains for the purpose of initial and
subsequent transportation of those remains.
"§ 90-210.61. Deposit or application of preneed funeral funds.
(a) Preneed funeral funds are subject to the provisions of this Article and shall be
deposited or applied as follows:
(1) If the preneed funeral contract purchaser chooses to fund the preneed funeral
contract by a trust deposit or deposits, deposit, the preneed licensee shall
deposit all funds in an insured account in a financial institution, in trust, in the
preneed licensee's name as trustee within five business days. The preneed
licensee, at the time of making the deposit as trustee, shall furnish to the
financial institution the name of each preneed funeral contract purchaser and
the amount of payment on each preneed funeral contract for which the deposit
is being made. The preneed licensee may establish an individual trust fund for
each preneed funeral contract or a common trust fund for all preneed funeral
contracts. The trust accounts shall be carried in the name of the preneed
licensee as trustee, but accounting records shall be maintained for each
individual preneed funeral contract purchaser showing the amounts deposited
and invested, and interest, dividends, increases, and accretions earned. Except
as provided in this Article, all interest, dividends, increases, or accretions
earned by the funds shall remain with the principal. The trust fund may be
charged with applicable taxes and for reasonable charges paid by the trustee
to itself or others for the preparation of fiduciary tax returns. Penalties charged
by a financial institution for early withdrawals caused by a transfer pursuant
to G.S. 90-210.63 shall be paid by the preneed licensee. Penalties charged as
a result of other early withdrawals as permitted allowed by this Article shall
be paid from the trust fund, and the financial institution shall give the preneed
funeral contract purchaser prompt notice of these penalties.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a preneed funeral contract is
funded by a trust deposit or trust deposits, deposit, a preneed licensee may
retain, free of the trust, up to ten percent (10%) of any payments made on a
preneed funeral contract, provided that so long as the preneed licensee fully
discloses in writing in advance to the preneed funeral contract purchaser the
percentage of the payments to be retained. If there is no substitution pursuant
to G.S. 90-210.63(a), the preneed licensee shall give credit for the amount
retained upon the death of the preneed funeral contract beneficiary and
performance of the preneed funeral contract.
(3) If the preneed funeral contract purchaser chooses to fund the contract by a
prearrangement insurance policy, the preneed licensee shall apply all funds
received for this purpose to the purchase of the prearrangement insurance
policy within five business days. The preneed licensee shall notify the
insurance company of the name of each preneed funeral contract purchaser
and the amount of each payment when the prearrangement insurance policy
or policies are is purchased.
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 31

(b) Except as provided by this Article or by the preneed funeral contract, all payments
made by the purchaser of a preneed funeral contract or prearrangement insurance policy shall
remain trust funds within a financial institution or as paid insurance premiums with an insurance
company, as the case may be, until the death of the preneed funeral contract beneficiary and until
full performance of the preneed funeral contract.
(c) Each preneed licensee may establish and maintain with a financial institution of its
choice, choice a preneed funeral fund clearing account. Preneed funeral funds received by a
preneed licensee may be deposited and held in such an this account until disbursed by the preneed
licensee to fund a preneed funeral contract pursuant to subdivisions (a)(1) or (a)(3) of this section.
This account shall be used solely for the receipt and disbursement of preneed funeral funds.
(d) Funds deposited in trust under a revocable or irrevocable preneed funeral contract
may, with the written permission of the preneed funeral contract purchaser, be withdrawn by the
trustee and used to purchase a prearrangement insurance policy. Within 10 days after the
purchase of the prearrangement insurance policy, the preneed licensee shall notify the Board, in
writing, of the name and address of the insurance company and any other information deemed
necessary by the Board. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to permit permits the
revocation of an irrevocable preneed funeral contract contract, and all funds withdrawn from trust
pursuant to this subsection shall be applied to the purchase of a prearrangement insurance policy.
(e) Except as provided by G.S. 90-210.61(c), subsection (c) of this section, at no time
before making a deposit or purchasing a prearrangement insurance policy may shall a preneed
licensee, or its agents or employees, deposit in its own account or the account of any other person
any monies coming into its hands for the purpose of funds whose purpose is purchasing services,
merchandise, or prearrangement insurance policies under the provisions of this Article.
…
"§ 90-210.67. Application for license.
(a) No person may shall offer or sell preneed funeral contracts or offer to make or make
any funded funeral prearrangements without first securing a license from the Board.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any a person who that offers to sell or sells a casket,
to be furnished or delivered at a time determinable by the death of the person whose body is
human remains are to be disposed of in the casket, shall first comply with the provisions of this
Article. There shall be are two types of licenses: a preneed funeral establishment license and a
preneed sales license. Only funeral establishments holding a valid an establishment permit
pursuant to G.S. 90-210.25(d) shall be issued by the Board are eligible for a preneed funeral
establishment license. Employees and agents of such these entities, upon meeting the
qualifications to engage in preneed funeral planning as established by the Board, shall be are
eligible for a preneed sales license. The Board shall establish the preneed funeral planning
activities that are permitted authorized under a preneed sales license. The Board shall adopt rules
establishing such qualifications and activities no later than 12 months following the ratification
of this act [Session Laws 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 901, s. 2]. A preneed sales licensee may sell
preneed funeral contracts, contracts and prearrangement insurance policies, policies and make
funded funeral prearrangements only on behalf of one preneed funeral establishment licensee;
provided, however, the a preneed sales licensee may sell preneed funeral contracts, contracts and
prearrangement insurance policies, policies and make funeral prearrangements for any number
of licensed preneed funeral establishments that are wholly owned by or affiliated with, through
common ownership or contract, the same entity; provided further, in the event entity. If the
preneed sales licensee engages in selling prearrangement insurance policies, they the preneed
sales licensee shall meet the licensing requirements of the Commissioner of Insurance. Every A
preneed funeral contract shall be signed by a person licensed as a funeral director or funeral
service licensee pursuant to Article 13A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.this Chapter.
Application for a license shall be in writing, signed by the applicant applicant, and duly
verified on forms furnished by the Board. Each application shall contain at least the following:
Page 32 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

the full names and addresses (both residence and place of business) addresses, both residential
and business, of the applicant, applicant and every partner, member, officer officer, and director
thereof thereof, if the applicant is a partnership, limited liability company, association, or
corporation corporation, and any other information as the Board shall deem necessary. deemed
necessary by the Board. A preneed funeral establishment license shall be is valid only at the
address stated in the application or at a new address approved by the Board.
(b) An application for a preneed funeral establishment license shall be accompanied by a
nonrefundable application fee of not more than four hundred dollars ($400.00). The Board shall
set the amounts of the application fees and renewal fees, fees by rule.
If the license is granted, the application fee shall be applied to the annual license fee for the
first year or part thereof. Upon receipt of the application and payment of the application fee, the
Board shall issue a renewable preneed funeral establishment license unless it determines that the
applicant has violated any provision of G.S. 90-210.69(c) or G.S. 90-210.69(c), has made false
statements or representations in the application, or is insolvent, or has conducted or is about to
conduct, conduct its business in a fraudulent manner, or is not duly authorized to transact business
in this State. The license shall expire expires on December 31 and each preneed funeral
establishment licensee shall pay annually to the Board on or before that date a license renewal
fee of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00). After February 1, a license may be
renewed by paying a late fee of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) in addition to the
annual renewal fee. Preneed funeral establishment permits that remain expired six months or
more cannot shall not be renewed renewed, and establishments must reapply for licensure
pursuant to this subsection.
If, after January 1, 2008, If a funeral establishment receiving receives a new preneed
establishment license or if a preneed establishment license has lapsed or has been terminated for
any reason, other than for failure to timely renew the license, the funeral establishment shall
obtain a surety bond in an amount not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for a period of
at least two years; provided, however, that the Board, in its discretion, may require the term of
the surety bond to be for five years. However, upon demonstrating to the satisfaction of the Board
that the funeral establishment is solvent, the Board may reduce the bond term to a period of no
less than one year from the date the original license is issued. The funeral establishment may (i)
purchase the bond from any company authorized by law to sell bonds in this State or (ii) deposit
fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) with the clerk of superior court in the county where the preneed
funeral establishment maintains its facility that is licensed or has submitted an application for
licensure to the Board. facility. The Board may extend the bonding bond requirement beyond a
period of five years in the event if there is a claim paid from the bond.
(c) An application for a preneed sales license shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable
application fee of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00). The Board shall set the amounts of the
application fees and renewal fees by rule, but the fees shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50.00). If
the license is granted, the application fee shall be applied to the annual license fee for the first
year or part thereof. Upon receipt of the application and payment of the application fee, the Board
shall issue a renewable preneed sales license provided so long as the applicant has met the
qualifications to engage in preneed funeral planning as established by the Board unless it
determines that the applicant has and has not violated any provision of G.S. 90-210.69(c). The
license shall expire expires on December 31 and each preneed sales licensee shall pay annually
to the Board on or before that date a license renewal fee of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00).
After February 1, a license may be renewed by paying a late fee of not more than twenty-five
dollars ($25.00) in addition to the annual renewal fee.
(d) Any A person selling a preneed funeral contract, whether funded by a trust deposit or
a prearrangement insurance policy, shall remit to the Board, within 10 days of the sale, a fee not
to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) for each sale and a copy of each contract. The person shall pay
a late fee of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each late filing and payment. The fees
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 33

shall not be remitted in cash. If the person resides in a county that is under a state of emergency,
as defined in G.S. 166A-19.3(19), G.S. 166A-19.3, at the time of the sale, then the Board shall
extend the period to file and pay the fee for each sale and copy of each contract to 30 days from
after the date of the sale.
(d1) The Board may also set and collect a fee of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00)
for the late filing of a certificate of performance and a fee of not more than one hundred fifty
dollars ($150.00) for the late filing of an annual report.
(e), (f) Repealed by Session Laws 2003-420, s. 14, effective October 1, 2003.
"§ 90-210.68. Licensee's books and records; notice of transfers, assignments assignments,
and terminations.
(a) Every A preneed licensee shall keep for examination by the Board accurate accounts,
books, and records in this State of all preneed funeral contract and prearrangement insurance
policy transactions used to fund preneed funeral contracts, copies of all agreements, insurance
policies, instruments of assignment, the dates and amounts of payments made and accepted
thereon, on them, the names and addresses of the contracting parties, the persons for whose
benefit funds are accepted, and the names of the financial institutions holding preneed funeral
trust funds and insurance companies issuing insurance policies used to fund preneed funeral
contracts. The Board, its inspectors appointed pursuant to G.S. 90-210.24 G.S. 90-210.24, and
its examiners, which the Board may appoint to assist in the enforcement of this Article, may may,
during normal hours of operation and periods shortly before or after normal hours of operation,
investigate the books, records, and accounts of any licensee under this Article with respect to
trust funds, preneed funeral contracts, and insurance policies used to fund preneed funeral
contracts. Any A preneed licensee who, that, upon inspection, fails to meet the requirements of
this subsection or who that fails to keep an appointment for an inspection shall pay a reinspection
fee to the Board in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00). The Board may
require the attendance of and examine under oath all persons whose testimony it may require.
Every preneed licensee shall submit a written report to the Board, at least annually, in a manner
and with such content as established by the Board, of its preneed funeral contract sales and
performance of such contracts. The Board may also require other reports.
(a1) On or before March 31 of each year, each preneed licensee shall prepare and submit
an annual report on its preneed funeral contract sales during the previous calendar year, to include
year that includes the total number, status, and type of each preneed contract for which the
preneed licensee serves as trustee, the total year-end balance of each contract, and the status of
each preneed contract. The preneed licensee shall submit the report to the Board in a manner and
form prescribed by the Board. The Board may also require other reports.
(b) A preneed licensee may transfer preneed funds held by it as trustee from the financial
institution which that is a party to a preneed funeral contract to a substitute financial institution
that is not a party to the contract. Within 10 days after the transfer, the preneed licensee shall
notify the Board, in writing, of the name and address of the transferee substitute financial
institution. Before the transfer may be made, the transferee financial institution shall agree to
make disclosures required under the preneed funeral contract to the Board or its inspectors or
examiners. institution and any other information deemed necessary by the Board. If the contract
is revocable, before transferring trust funds to the substitute financial institution, the licensee
shall notify the contracting party preneed contract purchaser or, if the preneed contract purchaser
is deceased, the preneed contract beneficiary of the intended transfer.
(c) If any a preneed licensee transfers or assigns its assets or stock to a successor funeral
establishment or terminates its business as a funeral establishment, the preneed licensee and
assignee shall notify the Board at least 30 days prior to before the effective date of the transfer,
assignment assignment, or termination: provided, however, the termination. The successor
funeral establishment must be a preneed licensee in good standing with the Board or shall be
required to apply for and be granted such this license by the Board before accepting any preneed
Page 34 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

funeral contracts, whether funded by trust deposits or preneed insurance policies. Provided
further, a A successor funeral establishment shall be is liable to the preneed funeral contract
purchasers for the amount of contract payments retained by the assigning or transferring funeral
home pursuant to G.S. 90-210.61(a)(2).
(d) Financial institutions that accept preneed funeral trust funds and, for any insurance
policy that names a funeral establishment as an assignee or beneficiary, the issuing or
underwriting insurance company shall, upon and insurance companies that issue or underwrite
insurance policies naming a funeral establishment as an assignee or beneficiary shall do all of the
following:
(1) Upon request by the Board or its inspectors, disclose any information
regarding the preneed funeral trust accounts or any insurance policy that
names a funeral establishment as an assignee or beneficiary.
(2) Financial institutions that accept preneed funeral trust funds and, for any
insurance policy that names a funeral establishment as an assignee or
beneficiary, the issuing or underwriting insurance company shall also forward
Forward the account balance or policy status and current death benefit to the
contracting preneed funeral establishment or the funeral establishment named
as an assignee or beneficiary at the end of each calendar year.
(d1) When a preneed funeral establishment license lapses or is terminated for any reason,
the preneed licensee shall immediately divest of all the unperformed preneed funeral contracts
and shall transfer them and any amounts retained under G.S. 90-210.61(a)(2) to a successor
preneed funeral establishment licensee in good standing with the Board pursuant to the
procedures of subsection (e) of this section. The contracting and the successor preneed funeral
establishments shall notify the Board at least 30 days prior to such transfer. Within 30 days
following the transfer, the contracting and successor preneed funeral establishments shall provide
notice of the transfer to each preneed contract purchaser and to the before the transfer and shall
notify the following within 30 days after the transfer:
(1) The financial institution housing the preneed funeral trust funds or the issuing
or underwriting insurance company for the contracts.
(2) Each preneed contract purchaser, unless the preneed contract is transferred
due to an acquisition or sale and the contract will continue to be performed at
the same physical address.
(e) In the event that any If a preneed licensee is unable or unwilling or is for any reason
relieved of its responsibility to perform as trustee or to perform any a preneed funeral contract,
the Board shall order the contract and any amounts retained pursuant to G.S. 90-210.61(a)(2) to
be assigned transferred to a substitute preneed licensee provided that neither the substitute
preneed licensee or preneed contract purchaser, or after the death of the preneed contract
purchaser, the preneed contract beneficiary or his or her legal representative, shall be obligated
to perform the agreement without executing a new preneed funeral contract. Any lapse or transfer
of a preneed contract pursuant to this section shall not be grounds to revoke an irrevocable
preneed funeral contract.licensee. The substitute preneed licensee is not obligated to perform the
contract but shall make reasonable efforts to execute a new preneed funeral contract with the
preneed contract purchaser or, if the preneed contract purchaser is deceased, the preneed contract
beneficiary. Nothing in this subsection, however, allows a preneed contract purchaser to revoke
an irrevocable preneed funeral contract, except as otherwise provided in this Article. The
substitute preneed licensee shall maintain the preneed contract in accordance with this Article
and shall include information about the preneed contract in its annual report to the Board under
subsection (a1) of this section.
(f) The substitute preneed licensee under subsections (d1) and (e) of this section shall be
is liable to the preneed funeral contract purchasers for the amount of contract payments that had
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 35

been retained by, and that the substitute preneed licensee has received from, the assigning
contracting preneed licensee."
SECTION 47. G.S. 90-210.85 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.85. Revocation of license.
In the event it is proven to the satisfaction of If the Board of Funeral Service finds that any a
burial association is being operated not in conformity with has violated any provision of this
Article, then it shall become the duty of the Board of Funeral Service the Board shall, upon
hearing to a hearing, revoke the license of said the burial association and transfer said burial
association, its membership and all its assets of every kind and description to another burial
association that is found by the Board of Funeral Service to be in good sound financial condition;
provided, that if said issue an order of dissolution pursuant to G.S. 90-210.107(i). If the burial
association gives notice of appeal as provided for in G.S. 90-210.94, then said the burial
association may continue to operate as before the revocation and until the appeal's final
adjudication."
SECTION 48. G.S. 90-210.107(i) reads as rewritten:
"(i) Upon receipt of a request for voluntary dissolution under subsection (h) of this section
or if the sponsoring funeral establishment has its permit revoked or ceases operation for any
reason, the Board shall issue an order of liquidation. The Board's order may shall direct that the
termination of all agreements for members' benefits be transferred to a financially sound mutual
burial association, as well as and the liquidation of all records, property, and unexpended
balances of funds of the association to be liquidated, if the financially sound mutual burial
association agrees in writing to accept the transfer. association. The Board's order shall direct the
burial association to complete the liquidation and to file a final report with the Board no later
than December 31 of the year of the liquidation. 30 days after the completion of the liquidation.
Upon receipt of the order of liquidation, the burial association shall:shall do all of the following:
(1) Cease accepting new members.
(2) Collect all debts owed to the association and pay all debts owed by the
association from monies money on hand, including the reserve.
(3) Distribute pro rata any remaining monies money on hand and in the reserve
among those who were members of the association and whose transfer could
not be accomplished on the date that the liquidation order was issued by the
Board. Each member's distributive share shall be determined by dividing the
amount of the member's benefit by the aggregate benefits of all members of
the association and then multiplying the total amount of money available for
distribution by the percentage so derived. Assessments owed by the members
to the association at the time of distribution shall be taken into account and
shall be offset against the members' distributive shares.
(4) Issue a certificate to members in an amount that equals the difference between
the distributive share issued in subdivision (3) of this subsection and the full
amount of the member's association benefit. Any This certificate issued shall
supersede and supplant any other certificate already issued by the association.
The certificate shall be on a form prescribed by the Board and shall be
prepared and distributed by the association at its expense.
(5) File a final report with the Board on or before December 31 in the year in
which the order of liquidation was issued. no later than 30 days after the
completion of the liquidation. This report shall show all receipts and
disbursements, including the amount distributed to each member, since the
last annual report of the association was filed with the Board."
SECTION 49. Subdivisions (8), (13), and (14) of G.S. 90-210.121 are recodified as
subdivisions (20c), (20e), and (20f), respectively, of that section.
Page 36 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

SECTION 50. Subsection (g) of G.S. 90-210.136 is recodified as subsection (d1) of
G.S. 90-210.129.
SECTION 51. Article 13F of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, as amended by
Sections 49 and 50 of this act, reads as rewritten:
"Article 13F.
"Cremations and Alkaline Hydrolysis.
"§ 90-210.120. Short title.
This Article shall be known and may be cited as the North Carolina Crematory Act.
"§ 90-210.121. Definitions.
As used in this Article, unless the context requires otherwise:The following definitions and
the definitions of Article 13A of this Chapter apply in this Article:
(1) Alkaline hydrolysis. – As defined in G.S. 90-210.20.
(1a) Authorizing agent. – A person or entity legally entitled to arrange for the final
disposition of human remains in accordance with G.S. 130A-420.
(2) Board. – The North Carolina Board of Funeral Service.
(3) Body parts. – Any of the following:
a. Limbs or other portions of the anatomy that are removed from a person
or human remains for medical purposes during treatment, surgery,
biopsy, autopsy, or medical research.
b. Human bodies or any portion thereof that have been donated to science
for medical purposes.
(4) Casket. – A rigid container that is designed for the encasement of human
remains and remains, that is usually constructed of wood, metal, or other
material and ornamented and lined with fabric, and which that may or may not
be combustible.
(5) Certificate of cremation. – reduction. – A certificate provided by the
crematory reduction facility manager who performed the cremation reduction
containing, at a minimum, all of the following information:
a. Name of decedent.
b. Date of cremation.reduction.
c. Name and address of crematory.reduction facility.
d. Signature of crematory reduction facility manager or person acting as
crematory the reduction facility manager.
(6) Cremated remains. – All human remains recovered after the completion of the
cremation process, including pulverization which that leaves only bone
fragments reduced to unidentifiable dimensions.
(7) Cremation. – The technical process, using intense heat and flame, that reduces
human remains to bone fragments. Cremation This term includes the
processing and may include the pulverization of the bone fragments.
(8) Recodified.
(9) Cremation container. – The A container that is composed of readily
combustible materials suitable for cremation, that is resistant to leakage or
spillage, and in which the human remains are transported to the crematory or
placed therein upon arrival for storage and placement in a cremation chamber
for cremation. A cremation container shall comply with all of the following
standards:arrival.
a. Be composed of readily combustible materials suitable for cremation.
b. Be able to be closed in order to provide a complete covering for the
human remains.
c. Be resistant to leakage or spillage.
d. Be rigid enough for handling with ease.
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 37

e. Be able to provide protection for the health, safety, and personal
integrity of crematory personnel.
f. Be easily identifiable. The covering of the cremation container shall
contain all of the following information:
1. The name of the decedent.
2. The date of death.
3. The sex of the decedent.
4. The age at death of the decedent.
(10) Cremation interment container. – A rigid outer container composed of
concrete, steel, fiberglass, or some similar material in which an urn is placed
prior to before being interred in the ground and which that is designed to
withstand prolonged exposure to the elements and to support the earth above
the urn.
(10a) Cremation society. – Any A person, firm, corporation, or organization that is
affiliated with a crematory licensed under this Article and provides cremation
information to consumers.
(11) Crematory or crematorium. – The building or buildings or portion of a
building on a single site that houses the cremation equipment, the holding and
processing facilities, the business office, and other parts of the crematory
business. A crematory must comply with all applicable public health and
environmental laws and rules and must contain the equipment and meet all of
the standards established by the rules adopted by the Board.
(12) Crematory licensee. – The An individual or legal entity that holds a license to
operate a crematory and perform cremations.
(13) Recodified.
(14) Recodified.
(15) Final disposition. – The cremation reduction and the ultimate interment,
entombment, inurnment, or scattering of the cremated reduced human remains
or the return of the cremated reduced human remains by the crematory
reduction licensee to the authorizing agent or such the agent's designee as
provided in this Article. Upon the written direction of the authorizing agent,
cremated remains may take various forms.
(16) Holding and processing facility. – An area or areas that are designated for the
retention of human remains prior to, before, and the retention and processing
of cremated reduced human remains after, cremation; that reduction; that
comply with all applicable public health and environmental laws; that
preserve the health and safety of the crematory reduction facility technician
and other personnel of the crematory; reduction facility; and that are secure
from access by anyone other than authorized persons. A holding facility and
processing facility must be located in a crematory.
(17) Human remains. – The body of a deceased person, including a separate human
fetus, regardless of the length of gestation, or body parts.
(17a) Hydrolysis container. – A container, other than a casket, designed to enclose
human remains and made of suitable material to be easily destroyed during
hydrolysis and to resist spillage and leakage. A hydrolysis container may be a
cremation container or any other container that meets the requirements of this
subdivision.The term includes a cremation container if it satisfies the
requirements of this definition.
(17b) Hydrolysis licensee. – A person or entity licensed to hydrolyze human remains
and perform hydrolysis.
Page 38 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

(17c) Initial container. – A receptacle for cremated reduced human remains, for
which the intended use and design is to hold cremated reduced human
remains, usually composed of cardboard, plastic, or similar material that can
be closed in a manner so as to prevent the leakage or spillage of the cremated
reduced human remains or the entrance of foreign material and is a single
container of sufficient size to hold the cremated reduced human remains.
(17d) Liquid waste. – Any liquid remaining after hydrolysis that does not contain
any trace elements of human tissue.
(18) Niche. – A compartment or cubicle for the memorialization or final
disposition of an urn or container containing cremated reduced human
remains.
(19) Processing. – The removal of bone fragments from the cremation reduction
chamber for the reduction in size, pulverization, labeling and packaging, and
placing in an urn or initial container.
(20) Pulverization. – The reduction of identifiable or unidentifiable bone fragments
after the completion of the cremation reduction to granulated particles by
mechanical means.
(20a) Reduced human remains. – The remains of a human body after completion of
reduction.
(20b) Reduction. – Alkaline hydrolysis, cremation, and any other method of final
disposition of human remains authorized pursuant to this Article.
(20c) Cremation Reduction chamber. – The enclosed space within which the
cremation reduction process takes place. Cremation chambers covered by this
Article shall be used exclusively for the cremation of human remains.
(20c)(20d) Reduction container. – A container, including a cremation container
container, hydrolysis container, or any other container that meets the
requirements of this subdivision other than a casket, designed to enclose
human remains and made of suitable material to be easily destroyed during
alkaline hydrolysis or cremation reduction and to resist spillage and leakage.
(20e) Crematory Reduction facility manager. – The person who is responsible for
the daily management and operation of the crematory. A crematory manager
must either be licensed to practice funeral directing or funeral service and be
qualified as a crematory technician or must obtain a crematory manager permit
issued by the Board. In order to receive a crematory manager permit, a person
must meet all of the following criteria:reduction facility.
a. Be at least 18 years of age.
b. Be of good moral character.
c. Be qualified as a crematory technician.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a crematory that is licensed by
the Board prior to January 1, 2004, and as of that date is not managed by a
crematory manager who is licensed to practice funeral directing or funeral
service, or who has a crematory manager permit, may continue to be managed
by a crematory manager who is not licensed to practice funeral directing or
funeral service or who does not have a crematory manager permit so long as
there is no sale, transfer, devise, gift, or any other disposal of a controlling
interest in the crematory.
(20f) Crematory Reduction facility technician. – Any An employee of a crematory
reduction licensee who has a certificate confirming that the crematory
technician employee has attended a training course approved by the Board.
The Board shall recognize the cremation certificate program that is conducted
by the Cremation Association of North America (CANA).completed a
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 39

cremation or alkaline hydrolysis technician certification program offered by a
manufacturer of reduction equipment, the Cremation Association of North
America (CANA), or a similar training program approved for continuing
education hours by the Board.
(21) Scattering area. – An area permitted by North Carolina law including, law,
including an area designated by a cemetery and located on dedicated cemetery
property where cremated reduced human remains that have been removed
from their container can be mixed with or placed on top of the soil or ground
cover.
(22) Repealed by Session Laws 2007-531, s. 18, effective August 31, 2007.
(23) Urn. – A receptacle designed to permanently encase the cremated reduced
human remains.
"§ 90-210.122. Repealed by Session Laws 2025-76, s. 1.2, effective October 1, 2025.
"§ 90-210.123. Licensing and inspection.
(a) Any person doing business in this State, or any cemetery, funeral establishment,
corporation, partnership, joint venture, voluntary organization, or any other entity may erect,
maintain, and operate a crematory in this State and may provide the necessary employees,
facilities, structure, and equipment for the cremation of human remains, provided that the person
or entity has secured No person or entity shall operate a crematory or cremate any human remains
without first obtaining a license as a crematory licensee in accordance with this Article. No
person or entity shall conduct alkaline hydrolysis of human remains without first obtaining a
license as a hydrolysis licensee in accordance with this Article. Only a funeral establishment
holding an establishment permit issued by the Board is eligible to be a hydrolysis licensee. A
reduction licensee shall reduce human remains only in a reduction facility in compliance with
this Article.
(a1) A crematory reduction facility operating under this Article is required to have a
crematory reduction facility manager. A crematory reduction facility manager may manage
multiple crematories reduction facilities within a 50-mile radius of each other. A crematory
reduction facility may operate for a period not to exceed 30 days without a crematory reduction
facility manager due to the crematory reduction facility manager's termination or cessation of
employment if all of the following criteria are met:
(1) The crematory reduction facility manager was the only person employed that
is eligible to serve as a crematory reduction facility manager at the time of the
crematory reduction facility manager's end of employment.
(2) The crematory reduction licensee retains one or more crematory reduction
facility technicians to perform cremations.reductions.
(3) The crematory reduction licensee registers the name of the crematory
technicians each reduction facility technician with the Board.
(a2) A reduction facility manager shall be licensed to practice funeral directing or funeral
service and shall be qualified as a reduction facility technician or shall hold a reduction facility
manager permit issued by the Board. To receive a reduction facility manager permit, a person
shall meet all of the following requirements:
(1) Be at least 18 years of age.
(2) Be of good moral character.
(3) Be qualified as a reduction facility technician.
However, a crematory licensee that was licensed by the Board before January 1, 2004, and
as of that date was not managed by a crematory manager who satisfied the requirements of this
subsection may continue to be managed by that crematory manager until there is a sale, transfer,
devise, gift, or other disposal of a controlling interest in the crematory licensee.
(b) A crematory may be constructed on or adjacent to any a cemetery, on or adjacent to
any a funeral establishment that is zoned commercial or industrial, or at any other location
Page 40 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

consistent with local zoning and environmental regulations. A reduction facility shall conduct
alkaline hydrolysis only on the premises of a funeral establishment holding an establishment
permit issued by the Board.
(c) Application for a license as a crematory reduction licensee shall be made on forms
furnished and prescribed by the Board. The Board shall inspect the premises, facilities, structure,
and equipment to be used as at a crematory, reduction facility, confirm that the crematory
reduction facility manager's and crematory reduction facility technician's educational certificate
is valid, and issue a renewable license to the crematory reduction licensee if the applicant meets
all the requirements and standards of the Board and the requirements of this Article.
(c1) All applicants for licensure shall consent to a criminal history record check. Refusal
to consent to a criminal history record check may constitute grounds for the Board to deny
licensure to an applicant. The Board shall ensure that the State and national criminal history is
checked for any applicant applying for initial licensure or for reinstatement of licensure, if such
the licensure has been expired for three or more years. The Department of Public Safety may
provide a criminal history record check to the Board for a person who has applied for a new or
renewed license under this Article; provided, however, that the Board and the applicant may
consent to the use of a criminal background check vendor other than the Department of Public
Safety, the cost of which shall be paid by the applicant. If the Department of Public Safety
performs the criminal background check, the Board shall provide to the Department of Public
Safety, along with the request, the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information
required by the Department of Public Safety, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to
the check of the criminal record and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying
information required by the State or national repositories. The applicant's fingerprints shall be
forwarded to the State Bureau of Investigation for a search of the State's criminal history record
file, and the State Bureau of Investigation shall forward a set of the fingerprints to the Federal
Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history check. The Board shall keep all
information pursuant to this subsection privileged, in accordance with applicable State law and
federal guidelines, and the and federal law. This information shall be is confidential and shall not
be is not a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. The Board, its officers
officers, and its employees, acting in good faith and in compliance with this section, shall be are
immune from civil liability for denying licensure to an applicant based on information provided
in the applicant's criminal history record check.
The Department of Public Safety may charge each applicant a fee for conducting the checks
of criminal history records authorized by this subsection.
(d) Every An application for licensure shall identify the crematory reduction facility
manager and all crematory technicians employed by the crematory licensee providing that
nothing reduction facility technicians for the reduction licensee. Nothing in this Article shall
prohibit prohibits the designation and identification by the crematory reduction licensee of one
individual to serve as a crematory reduction facility manager and crematory reduction facility
technician. Each crematory licensed in North Carolina reduction licensee shall employ on a
full-time basis at least one crematory reduction facility technician. Every An application for
licensure shall include each crematory reduction facility technician's educational certificate. The
crematory reduction licensee shall keep the Board informed at all times of the names and
addresses of the crematory reduction facility manager and all crematory reduction facility
technicians. In the event a licensee is in the process of replacing its only crematory reduction
facility technician at the time of license renewal, the licensee may continue to operate the
crematory reduction facility for a reasonable time period not to exceed 30 days.
(d1) Crematory licensees A reduction licensee that offer offers at-need cremation
reduction goods and services to the public shall comply with the standards set forth in Funeral
Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. § 453 (1984), as amended.16 C.F.R. Part 453.
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 41

(e) All licenses and permits shall expire A license or permit expires on the last day of
December of each year. After February 1, a license or permit may be renewed by paying a late
fee as provided in G.S. 90-210.132 in addition to the annual renewal fee. Licenses and permits
that remain A license or permit that remains expired six months or more require requires a new
application for renewal. Licenses and permits are A license or permit is not transferable.
(e1) A new application for a license or permit shall be made to the Board within 30 days
following a change of ownership of more than fifty percent (50%) of the business. A new
application for a license or permit is required if any of the following occur:occurs:
(1) A change to the legal structure of a crematory reduction licensee that results
in a change of a majority of the crematory reduction licensee's owners,
partners, managers, members, operators, or officers.
(2) A crematory reduction licensee's owner, partner, manager, member, operator,
or officer that holds a majority of the crematory's reduction licensee's
ownership interest dies. The estate of the decedent is permitted to may apply
for a permit within 180 days of the date of death.
(f) No person, cemetery, funeral establishment, corporation, partnership, joint venture,
voluntary organization, or any other entity shall cremate any human remains, except in a
crematory licensed for this express purpose and operated by a crematory licensee subject to the
restrictions and limitations of this Article or unless otherwise permitted by statute.
(g) Whenever If the Board finds that an owner, partner, crematory manager, member,
officer, reduction facility manager, or any crematory reduction facility technician of a crematory
licensee or any reduction licensee, an applicant to become a crematory reduction licensee, or that
any authorized an employee, agent, or representative of a reduction licensee has violated any
provision of this Article, or is guilty of any of the following acts, and when if the Board also
finds that the crematory operator reduction licensee or applicant has thereby become unfit to
practice, the Board may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew the license, in accordance
with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes:
(1) Conviction of or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a felony or
misdemeanor that indicates that the individual is unfit or incompetent to
engage in cremations reductions or that the individual has deceived or
defrauded the public.
(1a) Denial, suspension, or revocation of an occupational or business license by
another jurisdiction.
(2) Fraud or misrepresentation in obtaining or renewing a license, in the practice
of cremation, reduction, or in the operation of a licensee's business.
(3) False or misleading advertising.
(4) Solicitation of dead human bodies human remains by the licensee, his licensee
or the licensee's agents, assistants, or employees; but this subdivision shall not
be construed to prohibit employees. This subdivision does not prohibit general
advertising by the licensee.
(5) Employment directly or indirectly of any an agent, assistant, or other person
on a part-time or full-time basis or on commission for the purpose of calling
upon individuals or institutions by whose influence dead human bodies human
remains may be turned over to a particular licensee.
(6) The direct or indirect payment or offer of payment of a commission by the
licensee or the licensee's agent, assistant, or employees employee for the
purpose of securing business.
(7) Acts or omissions indicating that the licensee is unable to engage in
cremations reductions with reasonable skill and safety by reason of illness,
excessive use of alcohol, drugs, chemicals, or any other type of substance, or
by reason of any physical or mental abnormality.disability.
Page 42 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

(8) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to perform services under this Article,
including the use of a picture or name in connection with advertisements or
other written material published or caused to be published by the licensee.
(9) Failing to treat a dead human body human remains with respect at all times.
(10) Violating or cooperating with others to violate any of the provisions of this
Article, Article 13A, 13D, or 13E of this Chapter, or of the rules of the Board
or violation of Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. § 453 (1984), as
amended.16 C.F.R. Part 453.
(11) Violation of any State law or municipal or county local ordinance or
regulation affecting the handling, custody, care, or transportation of dead
human bodies.human remains.
(12) Refusing to surrender promptly the custody of a dead human body or cremated
remains human remains, including reduced human remains, upon the express
order of the person lawfully entitled to the custody thereof, their custody,
except as provided in G.S. 90-210.131(e).
(13) Indecent exposure or exhibition of a dead human body human remains while
in the custody or control of a licensee.
(14) Practicing funeral directing, embalming, or funeral service without a license.
(15) Allowing anyone other than a licensee of the Board or a crematory reduction
facility technician to perform a cremation.reduction.
(16) Failure to refund any insurance proceeds received as consideration in excess
of the funeral contract purchase price within 30 days of receipt.
(17) Failure to provide, within a reasonable time, either the goods and services
contracted for or a refund for the price of goods and services paid for but not
fulfilled.
(18) Violation of G.S. 58-58-97.
(19) Failure to respond to the Board's inquiries in a reasonable manner or time
regarding any matter affecting the individual's performance of
cremations.reductions.
(20) Failure to adequately supervise or oversee auxiliary licensed or unlicensed
staff, employees, agents, or contractors, as required by this Article and Article
13D, 13E, or 13F Articles 13D and 13E of this Chapter, any rules of the Board,
or the standards set forth in Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. § 453
(1984), as amended.16 C.F.R. Part 453.
(21) Knowingly failing to follow the lawful direction of a person with the right to
authorize disposition of human remains in accordance with G.S. 130A-420.
In any case in which the Board is authorized to take any of the actions permitted allowed
under this subsection, the Board may instead accept an offer in compromise of the charges
whereby by which the accused shall pay to the Board a civil penalty of not more than five
thousand dollars ($5,000). The clear proceeds of civil penalties imposed under this section shall
be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with G.S. 115C-457.2.
(h) Where If the Board finds a licensee is guilty of one or more of the acts or omissions
listed in subsection (g) of this section but it is determined by the Board that the licensee has not
thereby become unfit to practice, the Board may place the licensee on a term of probation in
accordance with the procedures set out in Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. In any case in
which the Board is entitled to place a licensee on a term of probation, the Board may also impose
a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) in conjunction with the probation.
The Board may determine the length and conditions of any period of probation, suspension,
revocation, or refusal to issue or renew a license.
(i) The Board may hold hearings in accordance with the provisions of this Article and
Article 3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. The Board is empowered to may regulate
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 43

and inspect crematories reduction facilities and crematory reduction licensees and to enforce as
provided by law the provisions of this Article and the rules adopted hereunder. Any crematory
under it. A reduction licensee that, upon inspection, is found not to meet any all of the
requirements of this Article shall pay a reinspection fee to the Board for each additional
inspection that is made to ascertain whether the deficiency or other violation has been corrected.
The Board may enforce compliance with the standards set forth in Funeral Industry Practices, 16
C.F.R. § 453 (1984), as amended, and 16 C.F.R. Part 453, in accordance with subsection (d1) of
this section.
(j) The Board may apply for injunctive relief in the superior court of (i) the county where
an act is alleged to have taken place, (ii) the county where the defendant resides, or (iii) Wake
County, if any person, firm, corporation, or other entity has committed an act allegedly violating
any provision of this Article. If a court of competent jurisdiction finds a defendant has acted in
violation of this Article, then the court shall issue an order enjoining and restraining the acts
constituting violations. The Board shall be is entitled to reimbursement of costs and attorneys'
fees expended in an action brought under this subsection.
In addition to the powers enumerated in Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the Board
shall have the power to may administer oaths and issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of
persons and the production of papers and records before the Board in any a hearing, investigation,
or proceeding conducted by it. Members of the Board's staff or the sheriff or other appropriate
official of any county of this State shall serve all notices, subpoenas, and other papers given to
them by the President of the Board for service in the same manner as process issued by any a
court of record. Any person who A person that neglects or refuses to obey a subpoena issued by
the Board shall be is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.
"§ 90-210.124. Repealed by Session Laws 2025-76, s. 1.5, effective October 1, 2025.
"§ 90-210.124A. Authorizing agent.
All crematory reduction licensees shall comply with G.S. 130A-420 when acting under their
respective scope of practice for dispositions of reduced human remains or body parts.
"§ 90-210.125. Authorization to cremate.reduce.
(a) A crematory reduction licensee shall not cremate reduce human remains until it has
received a cremation reduction authorization form signed by an authorizing agent. The cremation
reduction authorization form shall be prescribed by the Board and shall contain at a minimum
the following information:
(1) The identity of the human remains and confirmation that the human remains
are in fact the individual so named.
(2) The time and date of death of the decedent.
(3) The name and address of the funeral establishment and/or the establishment,
funeral director director, or funeral service licensee that obtained the
cremation reduction authorization.
(4) The name and address of the crematory reduction facility to be in receipt of
the human remains for the purpose of cremation.reduction.
(5) The name and address of the authorizing agent, the relationship between the
authorizing agent and the decedent, and the date and time of signature of the
authorizing agent.
(5a) The type of reduction authorized, such as cremation or alkaline hydrolysis,
and any other specific instruction regarding the disposition of the reduced
human remains.
(6) A representation that the authorizing agent does in fact have the right to
authorize the cremation reduction of the decedent and that the authorizing
agent is not aware of any living person who has a superior priority right to that
of the authorizing agent, as set forth in G.S. 130A-420. Or, in the event that
there is another living person who does have a superior priority right to that
Page 44 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

of the authorizing agent, a representation that the authorizing agent has made
all reasonable efforts to contact such this person, has been unable to do so, and
has no reason to believe that such this person would object to the cremation
reduction of the decedent.
(7) A representation that the authorizing agent has either disclosed the location of
all living persons with an equal right to that of the authorizing agent, as set
forth in G.S. 130A-420, or does not know the location of any other living
person with an equal right to that of the authorizing agent.
(8) Authorization for the crematory reduction licensee to cremate reduce the
human remains, including authorization to process or pulverize the cremated
reduced human remains.
(9) A representation that the human remains do not contain a pacemaker that is
not approved for cremation by the pacemaker's manufacturer or proper
regulating agency for the type of reduction authorized or any other material or
implant that may be potentially hazardous to the person performing the
cremation.reduction.
(10) The name of the person authorized to receive the cremated reduced human
remains from the crematory reduction licensee.
(11) The manner in which final disposition of the cremated remains is to take place,
if known. If the cremation authorization form does not specify final
disposition in a grave, crypt, niche, or scattering area, then the form shall
indicate that the cremated remains will be held by the crematory licensee for
30 days before they are disposed of, unless they are received from the
crematory licensee prior to that time, in person, by the authorizing agent or
his designee.Whether the reduced human remains will be finally disposed in
a specific manner, such as in a grave, crypt, niche, or scattering area, or
whether the reduced human remains shall be held by the reduction licensee or
person in possession of the reduced human remains in accordance with
G.S. 90-210.130(b).
(12) The signature of the authorizing agent attesting to the accuracy of all
representations contained on the cremation reduction authorization form,
except as set forth in subsection (b) of this section.
(13) If a cremation reduction authorization form is being executed on a preneed
basis, the cremation authorization form shall contain the disclosure required
by G.S. 90-210.126. The authorizing agent may specify in writing religious
practices that conflict with Article 13A, 13D, or 13F this Article or Article
13A or 13D of this Chapter. The crematory reduction licensee and funeral
director or funeral service licensee shall observe those religious practices
except where to the extent they interfere with cremation in a licensed
crematory reduction as specified under G.S. 90-210.123 or the required
requirements of documentation and record keeping.
(14) A The signature of the licensed funeral director or funeral service licensee of
the funeral establishment or crematory reduction licensee that received the
cremation reduction authorization form shall also sign the cremation
authorization form. Such form. Unless this individual has actual knowledge
to the contrary, this individual shall not be is not responsible for any of the
representations made by the authorizing agent, unless such individual has
actual knowledge to the contrary, except for the information requested by
subdivisions (a)(1), (2), (3), (4), and (9) of this section, which shall be
considered to be representations of the individual. In addition, the funeral
director or funeral service licensee shall warrant to the crematory reduction
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 45

licensee that the human remains delivered to the crematory reduction licensee
are the human remains identified on the cremation reduction authorization
form with any other documentation required by this State, any county, or any
municipality.
(15) A disclosure of the limitations of liability set out in G.S. 90-210.131.
(b) An authorizing agent who signs a cremation reduction authorization form shall be is
deemed to warrant the truthfulness of any facts set forth on the cremation reduction authorization
form, including that person's authority to order the cremation, reduction, except for the
information required by subdivisions (a)(4) and (9) of this section, unless the authorizing agent
has actual knowledge to the contrary. An authorizing agent signing a cremation reduction
authorization form shall be is personally and individually liable for all damages occasioned
thereby and resulting therefrom.resulting from it.
(c) A crematory reduction licensee shall have has the legal right to cremate reduce human
remains upon the receipt of a cremation reduction authorization form signed by an authorizing
agent. There shall be no liability for a crematory licensee that cremates human remains pursuant
to such authorization, or that releases or disposes of the cremated remains pursuant to such
authorization, except for such crematory licensee's gross negligence, provided that the crematory
licensee performs such functions in compliance with the provisions of this Article. There shall
be no liability for a funeral establishment or licensee thereof that causes a crematory licensee to
cremate human remains pursuant to such authorization, except for gross negligence, provided
that the funeral establishment and licensee thereof and crematory licensee perform their
respective functions in compliance with the provisions of this section.
(d) After the authorizing agent has executed a cremation reduction authorization form
and prior to before the commencement of the cremation, reduction, the authorizing agent may
revoke the authorization and instruct the crematory reduction licensee to cancel the cremation
reduction and to release or deliver the human remains to another crematory reduction licensee or
funeral establishment. Such These instructions shall be provided to the crematory reduction
licensee in writing. A crematory reduction licensee shall honor any instructions given to it by an
authorizing agent under this section, provided that so long as it receives such these instructions
prior to before the commencement of the cremation reduction of the human remains.
"§ 90-210.126. Preneed cremation reduction arrangements.
(a) Any A person, on a preneed basis, may authorize the person's own cremation
reduction and the final disposition of the person's cremated reduced human remains by executing,
as the authorizing agent, a cremation reduction authorization form on a preneed basis and having
the form signed by two witnesses in accordance with G.S. 130A-420. If the person executes a
cremation reduction authorization form on a preneed basis, the person shall retain a copy of this
form, and a copy shall be sent to the funeral establishment or the crematory reduction licensee,
or both. Any A person shall have the right to may transfer or cancel this authorization at any time
prior to before the person's death by destroying the executed cremation reduction authorization
form and providing written notice to the party or parties each party that received the cremation
reduction authorization form.
(b) Any cremation In the case of cremation, a reduction authorization form executed by
an individual as the individual's own authorizing agent on a preneed basis shall contain the
following disclosure, which disclosure that shall be completed by the authorizing agent:
/ / I do not wish to allow any of my survivors the option of canceling my
cremation and selecting alternative arrangements, regardless of whether my
survivors deem such a this change to be appropriate.
/ / I wish to allow only the survivors whom I have designated below the option
of canceling my cremation and selecting alternative arrangements or
continuing to honor my wishes for cremation and purchasing services and
merchandise if they deem such a this change to be appropriate.
Page 46 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

(b1) In the case of alkaline hydrolysis, a reduction authorization form executed by an
individual as the individual's own authorizing agent on a preneed basis shall contain the following
disclosure that shall be completed by the authorizing agent:
/ / I do not wish to allow any of my survivors the option of canceling my alkaline
hydrolysis and selecting alternative arrangements, regardless of whether my
survivors deem this change to be appropriate.
/ / I wish to allow only the survivors whom I have designated below the option
of canceling my alkaline hydrolysis and selecting alternative arrangements or
continuing to honor my wishes for alkaline hydrolysis and purchasing services
and merchandise if they deem this change to be appropriate.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (b) subsections (b) and (b1) of this section, at the
time of the death of a person who has executed, as the authorizing agent, a cremation reduction
authorization form on a preneed basis, any person in possession of the executed form, and any
person charged with making arrangements for the disposition of the decedent's human remains
who has knowledge of the existence of the executed form, shall use the person's best efforts to
ensure that the decedent's human remains are cremated reduced and that the final disposition of
the cremated reduced human remains is in accordance with the instructions contained on the
cremation reduction authorization form.
(d) If a crematory reduction licensee is in possession of a completed cremation reduction
authorization form, executed on a preneed basis, and the crematory reduction licensee is in
possession of the designated human remains, then the crematory reduction licensee shall be
required to cremate reduce the human remains and dispose of the human remains according to
the instructions contained on the cremation reduction authorization form. A crematory reduction
licensee that complies with the preneed cremation reduction authorization form under these
circumstances may do so without any liability. A funeral establishment or licensee thereof
establishment, funeral director, or funeral service licensee that causes a crematory reduction
licensee to act in accordance with the preneed cremation reduction authorization form under these
circumstances may do so without any liability.
(e) Any A preneed contract sold by, or preneed arrangements made with, a funeral
establishment that includes a cremation reduction shall specify the final disposition of the
cremated reduced human remains, pursuant to G.S. 90-210.130. In the event that no different or
inconsistent instructions are provided to the crematory reduction licensee by the authorizing
agent at the time of death, the crematory reduction licensee shall be is authorized to release or
dispose of the cremated reduced human remains as indicated in the preneed agreement. Upon
compliance with the terms of the preneed agreement, the crematory reduction licensee, and any
funeral establishment or licensee thereof who establishment, funeral director, or funeral service
licensee that caused the crematory reduction licensee to act in compliance with the terms of the
preneed agreement, shall be is discharged from any legal obligation concerning such cremated
remains.the reduced human remains.
(f) The provisions of this section shall This section does not apply to any a cremation
authorization form or preneed contract executed prior to the effective date of this act. Any before
October 1, 2003. A funeral establishment, however, with the written approval of the authorizing
agent or person who executed the preneed contract, may designate that such the cremation
authorization form or preneed contract shall be is subject to this act.section.
"§ 90-210.127. Record keeping.
(a) The crematory A reduction licensee shall furnish to the person who delivers such the
human remains to the crematory licensee it a receipt, signed by both the crematory reduction
licensee and the person who delivers the human remains, showing the date and time of the
delivery; the type of casket or cremation reduction container that was delivered; the name of the
person from whom the human remains were received and the name of the funeral establishment
or other entity with whom such which the person is affiliated; the name of the person who
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 47

received the human remains on behalf of the crematory reduction licensee; and the name of the
decedent. The crematory reduction licensee shall retain a copy of this receipt in its permanent
records for three years.
(b) Upon its release of reduced human remains, the crematory reduction licensee shall
furnish to the person who receives those reduced human remains from the crematory reduction
licensee a receipt, signed by both the crematory reduction licensee and the person who receives
the reduced human remains, showing the date and time of the release; the name of the person to
whom the reduced human remains were released and the name of the funeral establishment,
cemetery, or other entity with whom such which the person is affiliated; the name of the person
who released the reduced human remains on behalf of the crematory reduction licensee; and the
name of the decedent. The crematory reduction licensee shall retain a copy of this receipt in its
permanent records for three years.
(c) A crematory reduction licensee shall maintain at its place of business a record of all
forms required by the Board of each cremation reduction that took place at its facility for three
years. A funeral establishment shall maintain at its place of business a record of all forms
generated by or provided to it under this Article for a period of three years.
(d) The crematory licensee A reduction licensee shall maintain a record for three years
of all reduced human remains disposed of by the crematory reduction licensee in accordance with
G.S. 90-210.126(d).
(e) Upon completion of the cremation, the crematory reduction, the reduction licensee
shall issue a certificate of cremation.reduction.
(f) All records that are required to be maintained under this Article shall be are subject
to inspection by the Board or its agents upon request.
"§ 90-210.128. Cremation containers.Reduction containers.
(a) No crematory reduction licensee shall make or enforce any rules requiring that any
human remains be placed in a casket before cremation reduction or that human remains be
cremated reduced in a casket, nor shall any crematory licensee casket. A reduction licensee also
shall not refuse to accept human remains for cremation reduction for the reason that they are not
in a casket.
(b) No crematory reduction licensee shall make or enforce any rules requiring that any
cremated reduced human remains be placed in an urn or receptacle designed to permanently
encase the reduced human remains after the cremation reduction process has been performed.
(c) A reduction container shall comply with all of the following requirements:
(1) Be able to be closed in order to provide a complete covering for the human
remains.
(2) Be rigid enough for handling with ease.
(3) Be able to provide protection for the health and safety of reduction facility
personnel.
(4) Be easily identifiable. The covering of the reduction container shall contain
all of the following information:
a. The name of the decedent.
b. The date of death.
c. The sex of the decedent.
d. The age of the decedent at death.
"§ 90-210.129. Cremation Reduction procedures.
(a) For any death occurring in North Carolina certified by the attending physician or other
person authorized by law to sign a death certificate under the supervision of a physician, the body
human remains shall not be cremated reduced before the crematory reduction licensee receives a
death certificate signed by the person authorized to sign the death certificate, which shall contain,
at a minimum, all of the following information:
(1) Decedent's name.
Page 48 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

(2) Date of death.
(3) Date of birth.
(4) Sex.
(5) Place of death.
(6) Facility name (if not institution, give street and number).
(7) County of death.
(8) City of death.
(9) Time of death (if known).
(b) When required by G.S. 130A-388 and the rules adopted pursuant to that section or by
successor statute and the rules pursuant to it, a cremation reduction authorization form signed by
a medical examiner shall be received by the crematory prior to cremation.reduction licensee
before the reduction.
(c) In deaths coming under full investigation by For deaths under the jurisdiction of the
Office of the Chief Medical Examiner, a burial-transit permit/cremation authorization form must
a death certificate signed by a medical examiner and containing all of the information required
by subsection (a) of this section shall be received by the crematory before cremation.reduction
licensee before the reduction.
(c1) For any death occurring outside North Carolina, a crematory reduction licensee shall
not cremate a dead human body reduce human remains without first obtaining a copy of the
burial-transit or disposal permit issued under the law of the state, province, state or foreign
government in which death or disinterment occurred.
The provisions of this This subsection shall not be construed to does not waive the jurisdiction
of the medical examiner or subsection (b) of this section.
(d) No body human remains shall knowingly be cremated with a pacemaker or
defibrillator not approved for cremation by the pacemaker's manufacturer or proper regulating
agency or other potentially hazardous implant or condition in place. The authorizing agent for
the cremation of the human remains shall be is responsible for taking all necessary steps to ensure
that any pacemaker or defibrillator not approved for cremation by the pacemaker's manufacturer
or proper regulating agency or other potentially hazardous implant or condition is removed or
corrected prior to before the cremation. If an authorizing agent informs the funeral director,
funeral service licensee, or the crematory licensee, whichever is applicable, on the cremation
reduction authorization form of the presence of a pacemaker or defibrillator or other potentially
hazardous implant or condition in the human remains, then the funeral director, funeral service
licensee, or the crematory licensee, whichever is applicable or responsible for obtaining the
information required to complete the decedent's death certificate, shall also be is also responsible
for ensuring that all necessary steps have been taken to remove the pacemaker or defibrillator or
other potentially hazardous implant or to correct the hazardous condition before delivering the
human remains to the crematory. Anyone removing a hazardous implanted device or material
under this subsection shall comply with the laws and rules governing the handling of such
material and with any other regulations enforced by the proper regulating authority.this material.
(d1) Unless specified otherwise by the manufacturer of the equipment used for hydrolysis,
human remains may be hydrolyzed without first removing a pacemaker or defibrillator. Any other
potentially hazardous implanted device or material shall be handled in accordance with
G.S. 90-210.129(d).subsection (d) of this section.
(e) Human remains shall not be cremated reduced within 24 hours after the time of death,
unless such the death was a result of an infectious, contagious, or communicable and dangerous
disease as listed by the Commission for Public Health, pursuant to G.S. 130A-134, and unless
such this time requirement is waived in writing by the medical examiner, county health director,
or attending physician where the death occurred.
(f) No unauthorized person shall be permitted allowed in view of the cremation reduction
chamber or in the holding and processing facility while any human remains are being removed
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 49

from the cremation reduction container, processed, or pulverized. Relatives of the deceased and
their invitees, the authorizing agent and the agent's invitees, medical examiners, Inspectors
inspectors of the North Carolina Board of Funeral Service, Board, and law enforcement officers
in the execution of their duties shall be are authorized to have access to the crematory reduction
area, subject to the rules adopted by the crematory reduction licensee governing the safety of
such these individuals.
(g) Human remains shall be cremated only while enclosed in a cremation container.
container, and human remains shall be hydrolyzed only while enclosed in a hydrolysis container.
A reduction chamber shall be used exclusively for the reduction of human remains. Upon
completion of the cremation, reduction, and insofar as is to the extent possible, all of the
recoverable residue of the cremation reduction process shall be removed from the cremation
reduction chamber. Insofar as is To the extent possible, all residue of the cremation reduction
process shall then be separated from any foreign residue or anything else other than bone
fragments and shall then be processed by pulverization so as to reduce the cremated reduced
human remains to unidentifiable particles. Any foreign residue and anything other than the
particles of the cremated remains reduced human remains, including any liquid waste, shall be
removed from the reduced human remains as far as possible and shall be disposed of by the
crematory reduction licensee. This section does not apply where law otherwise when other law
provides for the commingling of human remains. The fact that there is incidental and unavoidable
residue in the cremation reduction chamber used in a prior cremation reduction is not a violation
of this subsection.
(g1) A reduction licensee shall comply with all applicable public health and environmental
laws in every operation of its business, including the disposal of liquid waste. A reduction
licensee shall maintain its equipment in accordance with, and meet all standards established by,
rules adopted by the Board.
(h) The simultaneous cremation reduction of the human remains of more than one person
within the same cremation reduction chamber is forbidden, provided that prohibited, except that
the following human remains may be cremated reduced simultaneously upon the express written
direction of the authorized agent:
(1) The human remains of multiple fetuses from the same mother and the same
birth.
(2) The human remains of multiple persons up to the age of one year old from the
same mother and the same birth.
(i) Every crematory A reduction licensee shall have a holding and processing facility,
within the crematory, reduction facility, designated for the retention of human remains prior to
cremation. The holding and processing facility must comply with any applicable public health
laws and rules and must meet all of the standards established pursuant to rules adopted by the
Board.before the reduction.
(j) Crematory licensees A reduction licensee shall comply with standards rules
established by the Board for the processing and pulverization of human remains by
cremation.reduction.
(k) Nothing in this Article shall require requires a crematory reduction licensee to
perform a cremation reduction that is impossible or impractical to perform.
(l) The reduced Reduced human remains with proper identification shall be placed in an
initial container or the urn selected or provided by the authorizing agent. The initial container or
urn contents shall not be contaminated with any other object, unless specific authorization has
been received from the authorizing agent or as provided in subsection (g) of this section.
(m) If the reduced human remains are greater than the dimensions of an initial container
or urn, the excess reduced human remains shall be returned to the authorizing agent or its
representative in a separate container or urn.
Page 50 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

(n) If the reduced human remains are to be shipped, the initial container or urn shall be
packed securely in a suitable shipping container that complies with the requirements of the
shipper. Reduced human remains shall be shipped only by a method which that has an internal
tracing system available and which that provides a receipt signed by the person accepting
delivery, unless otherwise authorized in writing by the authorizing agent. Reduced human
remains shall be shipped to the proper address as stated on the cremation reduction authorization
form signed by the authorizing agent.
(o) Unless the provisions of G.S. 130A-114 apply, applies, before cremation the
reduction of fetal remains, the crematory reduction licensee shall receive a written statement, on
a form prescribed by the Board and signed by the attending physician, acknowledging the
circumstances, date, and time of the delivery of the fetal remains from the mother. If after
reasonable efforts no physician can be identified with knowledge and information sufficient to
complete the written statement required by this subsection, the crematory reduction licensee shall
obtain documentation of the circumstances, date, and time of delivery of the fetal remains
prepared by a hospital, medical facility, law enforcement agency, or other entity.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a health care providers provider may release to a
licensee, in accordance with the federal Standards for Privacy of Individually Identifiable Health
Information under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA),
medical records that document the circumstances, date, and time of delivery of fetal remains. If
the crematory reduction licensee cannot identify documents sufficient to meet the requirements
of this subsection, the licensee shall report to the local medical examiner pursuant to
G.S. 130A-383(a).
(p) If the provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes apply, applies,
the crematory reduction licensee shall receive a fetal report of death as prescribed in
G.S. 130A-114.
(q) Before the cremation reduction of amputated body parts, the crematory a reduction
licensee shall receive a written statement, on a form prescribed by the Board and signed by the
attending physician, acknowledging the circumstances of the amputation. If after reasonable
efforts no physician can be identified with knowledge and information sufficient to complete the
written statement required by this subsection, the crematory reduction licensee shall notify the
local medical examiner pursuant to G.S. 130A-383(b). This section does not apply to the
disposition of body parts cremated pursuant to Part 3A of Article 16 of Chapter 130A of the
General Statutes.
(r) A crematory As provided in G.S. 90-210.27A(l), a reduction facility shall refrigerate
unembalmed human remains at a temperature not greater than 40 degrees Fahrenheit, unless the
cremation reduction will begin within 24 hours of the time in which the crematory licensee that
the reduction facility takes custody of the human remains.
"§ 90-210.130. Final disposition of reduced human remains.
(a) The authorizing agent shall provide the person with whom cremation which reduction
arrangements are made with a signed statement specifying the ultimate disposition of the reduced
human remains, if known. The crematory reduction licensee may store or retain reduced human
remains as directed by the authorizing agent. Records of retention and disposition of reduced
human remains shall be kept by the crematory reduction licensee pursuant to G.S. 90-210.127.
(b) The authorizing agent is responsible for the disposition of the reduced human remains.
If the authorizing agent or the agent's representative has not specified the final disposition or
claimed the reduced human remains within 30 days after the crematory reduction licensee or
person in possession of the reduced human remains provides written notice delivered by certified
mail to the authorizing agent's last known address that the reduced human remains are available
for retrieval, the crematory reduction licensee or the person in possession of the reduced human
remains may release the reduced human remains to another family member or dispose of the
reduced human remains only in a manner permitted allowed in this Article. The authorizing agent
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 51

shall be is responsible for reimbursing the crematory reduction licensee or person in possession
of the reduced human remains for all reasonable expenses incurred in disposing of the reduced
human remains pursuant to this section. A record of such the disposition shall be made and kept
by the person making the disposition. Upon disposing of reduced human remains in accordance
with this Article, the crematory reduction licensee or person in possession of the reduced human
remains shall be discharged from any legal obligation or liability concerning those reduced
human remains.
(c) In addition to the disposal of reduced human remains in a crypt, niche, grave, or
scattering garden located in a dedicated cemetery, or by scattering over uninhabited public land,
the sea, or other public waterways pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, reduced human
remains may be disposed of in any manner on the private property of a consenting owner, upon
direction of the authorizing agent. If reduced human remains are to be disposed of by the
crematory reduction licensee on private property, other than dedicated cemetery property, the
authorizing agent shall provide the crematory reduction licensee with the written consent of the
property owner.
(d) Except with the express written permission of the authorizing agent, no person shall
do any of the following:
(1) Dispose of or scatter reduced human remains in such a manner or in such a
location that the reduced human remains are commingled with those of
another person. This subdivision shall does not apply to the scattering of
reduced human remains at sea or by air from individual closed containers or
to the scattering of cremated reduced human remains in an area located in a
dedicated cemetery and used exclusively for those purposes.
(2) Place reduced human remains of more than one person in the same closed
container. This subdivision shall does not apply to placing the reduced human
remains of members of the same family in a common closed container
designed for the reduced human remains of more than one person with the
written consent of the family.
(e) Reduced human remains shall be released by the crematory reduction licensee to the
individual specified by the authorizing agent on the cremation reduction authorization form. The
representative of the crematory reduction licensee and the individual receiving the reduced
human remains shall sign a receipt indicating the name of the deceased, deceased and the date,
time, and place of the receipt, receipt and contain containing a representation that the handling
of the final disposition will be in a proper manner. accordance with this Article. After this
delivery, the cremated reduced human remains may be transported in any manner in this State,
without a permit, and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of this Article.
(f) Reduced human remains may be scattered over uninhabited public land, over a public
waterway or sea, subject to health and environmental standards, or on the private property of a
consenting owner pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. A person may utilize a boat or
airplane to perform scattering under this subsection. Reduced human remains shall be removed
from their closed container before they are scattered.
"§ 90-210.131. Limitation of liability.
(a) Any A person signing a cremation reduction authorization form as authorizing agent
shall be is deemed to warrant the truthfulness of any facts set forth in the cremation reduction
authorization form, including the identity of the deceased whose remains are sought to be
cremated reduced and that person's authority to order such cremation.the reduction.
(b) A crematory licensee shall have authority to cremate reduction licensee may reduce
human remains only upon the receipt of a cremation reduction authorization form signed by an
authorizing agent. There shall be is no liability of a crematory reduction licensee that cremates
reduces human remains pursuant to such this authorization or that releases or disposes of the
cremated reduced human remains pursuant to such this authorization. A crematory reduction
Page 52 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

licensee and funeral establishment or licensee thereof who establishment, funeral director, or
funeral service licensee that causes the crematory reduction licensee to act shall have has no
liability for the final disposition or manner in which the cremated reduced human remains are
handled after the cremated reduced human remains are released in accordance with the directions
of the authorizing agent.
(c) A crematory reduction licensee shall not be responsible or is not liable for any
valuables delivered to the crematory licensee it with human remains.
(d) A crematory reduction licensee shall not be is not liable for refusing to accept a body
human remains or to perform a cremation reduction until it receives a court order or other suitable
confirmation that a dispute has been settled if any of the following are satisfied:following apply:
(1) It is aware of any dispute concerning the cremation reduction of human
remains.
(2) It has a reasonable basis for questioning any of the representations made by
the authorizing agent.
(3) For any other lawful reason.
(e) If a crematory reduction licensee or a licensee under Article 13A of this Chapter is
aware of any dispute concerning the release or disposition of the reduced human remains, the
crematory licensee may refuse to release the reduced human remains until the dispute has been
resolved or the crematory licensee has been provided with a court order authorizing the release
or disposition of the reduced human remains. A crematory The licensee shall not be is not liable
for refusing to release or dispose of reduced human remains in accordance with this subsection.
A crematory The licensee may charge a reasonable storage fee if the dispute is not resolved within
30 days after it is received by the crematory licensee.
"§ 90-210.132. Fees.
(a) By rule, the Board may set and collect fees from crematory and hydrolysis reduction
licensees, crematory and hydrolysis reduction facility manager permit holders, and applicants not
to exceed the following amounts:
(1) Licensee application fee. ............................................................ $400.00
(2) Annual renewal fee. ..................................................................... 150.00
(3) Late renewal fee. ............................................................................ 75.00
(4) Reinspection fee. .......................................................................... 150.00
(5) Per cremation or reduction fee. ...................................................... 10.00
(6) Late fee, per cremation or reduction. ............................................. 10.00
(7) Late fee, cremation or reduction report. ........................ 75.00 per month
(8) Crematory or hydrolysis Reduction facility manager permit application fee.
...................................................................................................... 150.00
(9) Annual crematory or hydrolysis reduction facility manager permit renewal
fee. ................................................................................................. 40.00.
(b) The funds collected pursuant to this Article shall become part of the general fund of
the Board.
(c) No later than the tenth day of each month, every crematory licensee and hydrolysis
licensee under this Article a reduction licensee shall remit to the Board the per cremation or
reduction fees for the cremations or reductions which the crematory that the reduction licensee
performed during the immediately preceding calendar month. Each remittance shall be
accompanied by a statement signed by an authorized representative of the reduction licensee
containing all of the following information:
(1) The name of the crematory reduction licensee.
(2) Each decedent's name.
(3) Date of each cremation or reduction.
(4) The person or entity from whom each cremation or reduction was
performed.from which each decedent's human remains were received.
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 53

(5) The number of cremations or reductions contained in the statement.
(6) The total amount of fees remitted with the statement.
"§ 90-210.133. Crematory licensee Reduction licensee rights.
(a) A crematory reduction licensee may adopt reasonable rules consistent with this
Article for the management and operation of a crematory. reduction facility. Nothing in this
subsection may be construed to prevent a crematory prevents a reduction licensee from adopting
rules which that are more stringent than the provisions of this Article.
(b) Nothing in this Article may be construed to relieve the crematory relieves a reduction
licensee from obtaining any other licenses or permits required by law.
(c) Nothing in this Article shall prohibit or require prohibits or requires the performance
of cremations reductions by crematory reduction licensees or crematory reduction facility
managers for or directly with the public or exclusively for or through licensed funeral directors.
"§ 90-210.134. Rulemaking, applicability, violations, and prohibitions of Article.
(a) The Board is authorized to may adopt and promulgate such rules for the carrying out
and enforcement of the provisions of this Article as may be necessary and as are consistent with
the laws of this State and of the United States. this Article. The Board may develop a Standard
Cremation Authorization Form reduction authorization form and procedures for its execution that
shall be used by the crematory licensee subject to this Article, a reduction licensee, unless a
crematory the licensee has its own form approved by the Board. A crematory reduction licensee
that uses its own approved cremation reduction authorization form must have the cremation
authorization form reapproved shall seek reapproval of its form if changed or after amendments
are made to this Article or the rules adopted by the Board related to cremation reduction
authorization forms. The Board may perform such other acts and exercise such other powers and
duties as may be provided in this Article, in Article 13A of this Chapter, and otherwise by law
and as may be that are necessary to carry out the powers herein conferred.and enforce this Article.
(b) The provisions of this Article shall This Article does not apply to the cremation
reduction of medical waste performed by the North Carolina Anatomical Commission, licensed
hospitals and medical schools, and the office of the Chief Medical Examiner when the disposition
of such the medical waste is the legal responsibility of the institutions.
(c) A violation of any of the provisions of this Article is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
(d) No person, firm, or corporation may request or authorize cremation reduction or
cremate reduce human remains when if the person, firm, or corporation has information
indicating a crime or violence of any sort in connection with the cause of death unless such the
information has been conveyed to the State or county medical examiner and permission from the
State or county medical examiner to cremate reduce the human remains has thereafter been
obtained.
"§ 90-210.135. Cremation societies.
No person, firm, or corporation licensed as a crematory licensee under the provisions of this
Article may operate a cremation society without first registering the name of the cremation
society with the Board.
"§ 90-210.136. Hydrolysis of human remains.
(a) Repealed by Session Laws 2025-76, s. 1.15, effective October 1, 2025.
(b) No person, cemetery, funeral establishment, corporation, partnership, joint venture,
voluntary organization, or other entity shall hydrolyze human remains without first obtaining a
license from the Board. Only funeral establishments holding a valid establishment permit
pursuant to G.S. 90-210.25(d) shall be eligible to be a hydrolysis licensee. An application for a
license under this subsection shall be made on forms furnished and prescribed by the Board.
(c) Except as otherwise provided by this section, a license for the hydrolysis of human
remains shall comply with all provisions of this Article, including G.S. 90-210.127 and
G.S. 90-210.130, and be subject to the same fees as for the licensing of crematories under this
Article. The hydrolysis of human remains shall be conducted in compliance with all requirements
Page 54 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

for cremation, and the licensee shall pay the same fees for monthly reports for each hydrolysis
as crematories under this Article.
(c1) Alkaline hydrolysis shall not be performed except on the physical premises of a
funeral establishment holding a valid establishment permit pursuant to G.S. 90-210.25(d).
(d) The Board shall have the same powers to regulate, enforce, discipline, and inspect
hydrolysis licensees and the practice of hydrolysis that have been granted under this Article for
the regulation, enforcement, discipline, and inspection of crematories and the practice of
cremation.
(e) Any solid remains or residue remaining after hydrolysis shall be treated and disposed
of as cremated remains under this Article. Disposal of liquid waste shall be subject to all
applicable health and environmental laws and regulations.
(f) Human remains shall be hydrolyzed in a hydrolysis container and shall not be required
to be hydrolyzed in a casket.
(g) Recodified.
(h) The Board shall promulgate rules necessary to effectuate the licensing of alkaline
hydrolysis."
PART II. CONFORMING CHANGES
SECTION 52. G.S. 15B-2(1) and (3) read as rewritten:
"(1) Allowable expense. – Reasonable charges incurred for reasonably needed
products, services, and accommodations, including those for medical care,
rehabilitation, medically-related property, and other remedial treatment and
care. Reasonably needed services include (i) counseling for immediate family
members of children under the age of 18 who are victims of rape, sexual
assault, or domestic violence and (ii) family counseling and grief counseling
for immediate family members of homicide victims. The cumulative total for
counseling services provided to immediate family members shall not exceed
three thousand dollars ($3,000) per family.
Allowable expense includes a total charge not in excess of ten thousand
dollars ($10,000) for expenses related to funeral, cremation, cremation or
hydrolysis, and burial, including transportation of a body, but excluding
expenses for flowers, gravestone, and other items not directly related to the
funeral service.
Allowable expense for medical care, counseling, rehabilitation,
medically-related property, and other remedial treatment and care of a victim
shall be limited to sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66 2/3%) of the amount
usually charged by the provider for the treatment or care. By accepting the
compensation paid as allowable expense pursuant to this subdivision, the
provider agrees that the compensation is payment in full for the treatment or
care and shall not charge or otherwise hold a claimant financially responsible
for the cost of services in addition to the amount of allowable expense.
…
(3) Collateral source. – A source of benefits or advantages for economic loss
otherwise compensable that the victim or claimant has received or that is
readily available to the victim or the claimant from any of the following
sources:
…
i. A contract of insurance that will pay for expenses directly related to a
funeral, cremation, cremation or hydrolysis, and burial, including
transportation of a body.
…."
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 55

SECTION 53. G.S. 15B-11(g) reads as rewritten:
"(g) Compensation payable to a victim and to all other claimants sustaining economic loss
because of injury to, or the death of, that victim may not exceed forty-five thousand dollars
($45,000) in the aggregate in addition to allowable funeral, cremation, cremation or hydrolysis,
and burial expenses."
SECTION 54. G.S. 32A-16(1) reads as rewritten:
"(1) Disposition of remains. – The decision to bury or cremate reduce human
remains, as human remains are defined in G.S. 90-210.121, G.S. 90-210.20,
and, subject to G.S. 32A-19(b), arrangements relating to burial or
cremation.burial, cremation, or hydrolysis."
SECTION 55. G.S. 32A-25.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 32A-25.1. Statutory form health care power of attorney.
(a) The use of the following form in the creation of a health care power of attorney is
lawful and, when used, it shall meet the requirements of and be construed in accordance with the
provisions of this Article:
…
______________ E. Autopsy and Disposition of Remains. In exercising the
(Initial) authority to make decisions regarding autopsy and disposition
of remains on my behalf, the authority of my health care agent
is subject to the following special provisions and limitations.
(Here you may include any specific limitations you deem
appropriate such as: limiting the grant of authority and the
scope of authority, or instructions regarding burial or
cremation):burial, cremation, or hydrolysis):
__________________________________________________
__________________________________________________
NOTE: DO NOT initial unless you insert a limitation.
…."
SECTION 56. G.S. 58-58-97(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Any licensee or employee of a funeral establishment licensed having a permit issued
under Article 13A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes who makes a false request for
information under this section or fails to do that required by subsection (c) of this section shall
be deemed guilty of commits fraud or misrepresentation in the practice of funeral service as
defined in G.S. 90-210.25(e)(1)b. service, which is grounds for discipline under
G.S. 90-210.28A, and is unfit to practice funeral service."
SECTION 57. G.S. 65-48(4) and (7) read as rewritten:
"(4) "Cemetery broker" means a legal entity engaged in the business of arranging
sales of cemetery products between legal entities and which sale does not
involve a cemetery company, but does not mean funeral establishments or
funeral directors operating under G.S. 90-210.25, Article 13A of Chapter 90
of the General Statutes when dealing between legal entities wherein one such
entity shall be members of the family of a deceased person or other persons
authorized by law to arrange for the burial and funeral of such deceased human
being. The North Carolina Cemetery Act shall not apply to any cemetery
broker selling less than five grave spaces per year.
…
(7) "Cemetery sales organization" means any legal entity contracting with a
cemetery which is exempt or not exempt under this Article to conduct sales of
cemetery products, but does not mean individual salesmen or sales managers
employed by and contracting directly with cemetery companies operating
under this Article, nor does it mean funeral establishments or funeral directors
Page 56 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

operating under licenses authorized by G.S. 90-210.25 Article 13A of Chapter
90 of the General Statutes when dealing directly with a cemetery company
and with members of the family of a deceased person or other persons
authorized by law to arrange for the burial and funeral of such deceased human
being."
SECTION 58. G.S. 88B-25 reads as rewritten:
"§ 88B-25. Exemptions.
The following persons are exempt from the provisions of this Chapter while engaged in the
proper discharge of their professional duties:
(1) Undertakers and funeral establishments licensed under
G.S. 90-210.25.Funeral establishments and funeral directors and other
individuals holding a permit or license issued under Article 13A of Chapter
90 of the General Statutes.
(2) Persons authorized to practice medicine or surgery under Article 1 of Chapter
90 of the General Statutes.
(3) Nurses licensed under Article 9A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
(4) Commissioned medical or surgical officers of the United States Army, Air
Force, Navy, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard.
(5) A person employed in a cosmetic art shop whose duties are expressly confined
to the shampooing or blow drying of hair, provided that so long as the person
shall comply complies with rules adopted by the Board relating to sanitary
management of cosmetic art shops."
SECTION 59. G.S. 90-210.25B(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) If a person or entity holding a license, permit, or registration in another jurisdiction
has the license revoked, suspended, or placed on probation because of conduct related to fitness
to practice as described in G.S. 90-210.25(e), the board that is grounds for discipline under
G.S. 90-210.28A, the Board shall impose a sanction equal to or greater than the sanction imposed
by the other jurisdiction."
SECTION 60. G.S. 90-210.69 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.69. Rulemaking; enforcement of Article; judicial review; determination of
penalty amount.
…
(c) …
Revocation of a funeral establishment permit granted pursuant to G.S. 90-210.25(d)(2) shall
result issued by the Board results in the automatic revocation of the firm's preneed funeral
establishment permit by operation of law. Active suspension of a funeral establishment permit
granted pursuant to G.S. 90-210.25(d)(2) shall result issued by the Board results in the automatic
active suspension of the firm's preneed funeral establishment permit for the same length of time
by operation of law. In any case in which the Board is authorized to take any of the actions
permitted authorized under this subsection, the Board may instead accept an offer in compromise
of the charges whereby the accused shall pay to the Board a penalty of not more than five
thousand dollars ($5,000). In any case in which the Board is entitled to place a licensee on a term
of probation, the Board may also impose a penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000)
in conjunction with such the probation. The Board may determine the length and conditions of
any period of probation, revocation, suspension, or refusal to issue or renew a license.
(d) Any proceedings under this Article pertaining to or actions against a funeral
establishment under this Article may be in addition to any proceedings or actions permitted by
G.S. 90-210.25(d)(4). Any proceedings pertaining to or actions against or a person licensed for
as a funeral directing director or funeral service may be licensee are in addition to any
proceedings or actions permitted by G.S. 90-210.25 (e)(1) and (2).authorized by Article 13A of
this Chapter.
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 57

…."
SECTION 61. G.S. 90-210.80 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.80. Duties of Board; meetings.
…
The North Carolina Board of Funeral Service, after a public hearing, may promulgate
reasonable rules and regulations for the enforcement of this Article and in order to carry out the
intent thereof. Service may adopt rules to enforce this Article. The Board is authorized and
directed to must adopt specific rules to provide for the orderly transfer of a member's benefits in
cash or merchandise and services from the funeral director sponsoring the member's association
to the funeral establishment which that furnishes a funeral service, or merchandise, or both, for
the burial of the member, provided that any member. A funeral establishment to which the
member's benefits are transferred in accordance with such rules shall, must, if located in North
Carolina, be have a funeral establishment registered and permitted under the provisions of G.S.
90-210.25 or shall, if permit issued by the Board. If the funeral establishment to which the
member's benefits are transferred is located in any other state, territory territory, or foreign
country, be a funeral establishment it must be recognized by and operating operate in conformity
with the laws of such the other state, territory territory, or foreign country. One or more burial
associations operating in North Carolina may merge into another burial association operating in
North Carolina and two or more burial associations operating in North Carolina may consolidate
into a new burial association provided that any such association. A plan of merger or a plan of
consolidation shall be adopted and carried out in accordance with rules adopted by the Board
pursuant to this Article.Board.
…."
SECTION 62. G.S. 90-210.81 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.81. Requirements as to rules and bylaws.
…
Article 10. It is understood and stipulated that the benefits provided for shall be payable only
to a funeral establishment which provides a funeral service for a deceased member and which, if
located in North Carolina, is a funeral establishment registered under the provisions of G.S.
90-210.25 that has an establishment permit issued by the Board of Funeral Service or which, if
located in any other state, territory or foreign country, is a funeral establishment recognized by
and operating in conformity with the laws of such other state, territory or foreign country. Upon
the death of any member, it shall be the duty of the person or persons making the funeral
arrangements for such deceased member to notify the secretary of the member's burial association
of the death of such member. The person or persons making the funeral arrangements for such
deceased member shall have 30 days from the date of the death of such member in which to make
demand upon the burial association for the funeral benefits to which such member is entitled.
The benefits provided for are to be paid by the burial association to the funeral director
providing such funeral and burial service either in cash or in merchandise and service as elected
by the person or persons making the funeral arrangements for such deceased member. If the
burial association shall fail, on demand, to provide the benefits to which the deceased member
was entitled to the funeral establishment which provided the funeral service for the deceased
member, then the benefits shall be paid in cash to the representative of the deceased member
qualified under law to receive such benefits.
…."
SECTION 63. G.S. 130A-412.16(h) reads as rewritten:
"(h) Subject to G.S. 130A-412.13(i) and G.S. 130A-412.25, the rights of the person to
which whom a body part passes under G.S. 130A-412.13 are superior to the rights of all others
with respect to the body part. The person may accept or reject an anatomical gift in whole or in
part. Subject to the terms of the document of gift and this Part, a person that accepts an anatomical
gift of an entire body may allow embalming, burial, or cremation, and use of remains in a funeral
Page 58 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

service. If the gift is of a body part, the person to which the body part passes under
G.S. 130A-412.13, upon the death of the donor and before embalming, burial, or cremation,
cremation, or hydrolysis shall cause the body part to be removed without unnecessary
mutilation."
SECTION 64. G.S. 130A-420(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) An individual at least 18 years of age may authorize the type, place, and method of
disposition of the individual's own dead body by methods in the following order:
(1) Pursuant to a preneed funeral contract executed pursuant to Article 13D of
Chapter 90 of the General Statutes or pursuant to a cremation reduction
authorization form executed pursuant to Article 13C 13F of Chapter 90 of the
General Statutes.
…."
SECTION 65. G.S. 160A-341 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-341. Authority to establish and operate cemeteries.
A city shall have authority to may establish, operate, and maintain cemeteries either inside or
outside its corporate limits, may acquire and hold real and personal property for cemetery
purposes by gift, purchase, or (for real property) by exercise of the power of eminent domain,
may devote any property owned by the city to use as a cemetery, may prohibit burials at any
place within the city other than city cemeteries, and may regulate the manner of burial in city
cemeteries. Nothing in this section shall confer confers upon any city authority to prohibit or
regulate burials in cemeteries licensed by the State Burial Association Commissioner, Cemetery
Commission, or in church cemeteries.
As used in this Article "cemetery" includes columbariums and facilities for
cremation.cremation or hydrolysis."
PART III. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE LICENSING PROGRAMS
SECTION 66.(a) Subdivisions (6), (7), (8), and (9) of G.S. 58-16-5 are recodified
as sub-subdivisions e., f., g., and h. of subdivision (2) of that section.
SECTION 66.(b) G.S. 58-16-5, as amended by subsection (a) of this section, reads
as rewritten:
"§ 58-16-5. Conditions of licensure.
A foreign or alien insurance company may be licensed to do business when it:if it meets all
of the following requirements:
(1) Deposits with the Commissioner a certified copy of its charter or certificate of
organization and a statement of its financial condition and business, in the
form and detail that the Commissioner requires, signed and sworn to by its
president and secretary or other proper officer, and pays for the filing of this
statement the sum licensure application fee required by law.
(2) Satisfies the Commissioner of all of the following:
a. that it It is fully and legally organized under the laws of its state or
government to do the business it proposes to transact as direct
insurance or assumed reinsurance; reinsurance, and it has been
successful in the conduct of this business.
b. that it It has, if a stock company, a free surplus and a fully paid-up and
unimpaired capital, exclusive of stockholders' obligations of any
description description, of an amount not less than that required for the
organization of a domestic company writing the same kinds of
business; andbusiness.
c. It has, if a mutual company that its company, a free surplus is not less
than that required for the organization of a domestic company writing
the same kind of business, andbusiness.
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 59

d. that the Its capital, surplus, and other funds are invested substantially
in accordance with the requirements of this Chapter.
e. Satisfies the Commissioner that it It is in substantial compliance with
G.S. 58-7-21, 58-7-26, 58-7-30, and 58-7-31 and Article 13 of this
Chapter.
f. Satisfies the Commissioner that it is in compliance It complies with
the company name requirements of G.S. 58-7-35.
g. Satisfies the Commissioner that the The operation of the company in
this State would not be hazardous to prospective policyholders,
creditors, or the general public.
h. Satisfies the Commissioner that it It is in substantial compliance with
the requirements of G.S. 58-7-37 pertaining to the background of its
officers and directors.
(3) Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 517, s. 6.
(4) Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 629, s. 20.
(5) Files with the Commissioner a certificate that it has complied with the laws of
the state or government under which it was organized and is authorized to
make contracts of insurance.
(6) through (9) Recodified.
(10) Files with the Commissioner an instrument appointing the Commissioner as
the company's agent on whom any legal process under G.S. 58-16-30 may be
served. This appointment is irrevocable as long as any liability of the company
remains outstanding in this State. A copy of this instrument, certified by the
Commissioner, is sufficient evidence of this appointment; appointment, and
service upon the Commissioner is sufficient service upon the company."
SECTION 66.(c) No later than January 1, 2027, the Department of Insurance shall
adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 66.(d) This section is effective when it becomes law.
SECTION 67. G.S. 58-71-75 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-71-75. License renewal; criminal history record checks; renewal fees.
(a) Biennial Renewal. – A license of a bail bondsman and a license of a runner shall be
renewed on July 1 of each even year upon payment of the applicable biennial renewal fee. In
addition to paying the biennial renewal fee, an applicant seeking renewal must shall submit an
application for renewal in accordance with this section. The Commissioner is not required to
print renewal licenses.
(b) Renewal Application. – In even-numbered years, a bail bondsman or runner seeking
to renew a license shall provide the Commissioner prior to the expiration date of the bail
bondsman's or runner's current license, all of the following:
(1) A renewal application containing all of the following:
a. Proof that the applicant is a resident of this State as required by
G.S. 58-71-50(c).
b. Proof that the applicant meets the qualifications set out in
G.S. 58-71-50(b)(5) through
G.S. 58-71-50(b)(7).G.S. 58-71-50(b)(9).
c. The information required by G.S. 58-2-69.
(2) The biennial renewal fee as provided in subsection (d) of this section.
(3) Repealed by Session Laws 2016-107, s. 4, effective July 22, 2016.
…."
SECTION 68.(a) G.S. 58-89A-5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-89A-5. Definitions.
In this Article:The following definitions apply in this Article:
Page 60 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

(1) "Applicant" means a Applicant. – A person applying for a license or a group
license under this Article.
(2) "Assigned employee" means an Assigned employee. – An employee who is
performing services for a client company under a contract between a licensee
and a client company in which employment responsibilities are shared or
allocated. "Assigned employee" This term does not include a temporary
employee. Individuals This term includes individuals who are directors,
shareholders, partners, and managers of a client company are assigned
employees to the extent the licensee and the client have agreed that those
individuals are assigned employees and provided that those individuals meet
the criteria of this subdivision and act as operational managers or perform
reviews for the client company.
(3) "Audited financial statement" means a Audited financial statement. – A
financial statement that is audited by an independent certified public
accountant and presented in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles.
(4) "Client company" or "client" means a Client company or client. – A person
that contracts with a licensee and is assigned employees by the licensee under
that contract.
(5) "Control", including the terms "controlling", "controlled by", and "under
common control with" means the Control. – The direct or indirect possession
of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies
of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract
other than a commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement services, or
otherwise. Control is presumed to exist if any natural person an individual
directly or indirectly owns, controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds
proxies representing ten percent (10%) or more of the voting securities of any
other another person. This presumption may be rebutted by a showing made
in the manner provided by rule of the Commissioner. The Commissioner may
determine, after furnishing all persons in interest notice and opportunity to be
heard and making specific findings of fact to support such the determination,
that control exists in fact, notwithstanding the absence of a presumption to
that effect.
(6) "Financial responsibility" means the Financial responsibility. – The current
and expected future condition of financial solvency sufficient to support a
reasonable expectation that an applicant or licensee can successfully conduct
its business without jeopardizing the interests of its assigned employees, client
companies, or the public.
(7) "Good moral character" means a Good moral character. – A personal history
of honesty, trustworthiness, fairness, a good reputation for fair dealings, and
respect for the rights of others and for state State and federal laws.
(8) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-413, s. 11.1(a), effective October 1, 2013.
(9) "Licensee" means a Licensee. – A person licensed under this Article to
provide professional employer services. The term includes a professional
employer organization group licensed under G.S. 58-89A-35(b). Unless
specifically stated otherwise in this Article, "licensee" this term includes
persons who that are licensed under this Article pursuant to alternative
licensing procedures as set forth in G.S. 58-89A-76.
(10) "Managed services" means services Managed services. – Services provided
by an organization that is the sole employer of employees whom it supplies to
staff and manage a specific portion of a company's workforce or a specific
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 61

facility within a company on an ongoing basis. The managed services This
organization has responsibility for ensuring the capabilities and skills of the
employees it supplies or provides, for all employer functions, for supervisory
responsibility over the employees, and for management accountability of the
facility or function.
(11) "PEO agreement" means a PEO agreement. – A written contract by and
between a client company and a professional employer organization that
provides:provides both of the following:
a. For the The allocation and sharing between the client company and the
licensee of the responsibilities of employers with respect to the
assigned employees, including hiring, firing, and disciplining of
employees; andemployees.
b. That the licensee and the client company assume the responsibilities
required by this Article.
(12) "Person" has the same meaning as in G.S. 58-1-5(9).
(13) "Personnel placement service" means a Personnel placement service. – A job
placement service offered through an organization that assists persons
individuals seeking employment to find a job with companies that are seeking
employees. Companies that hire persons through a personnel placement
service are the sole employers of the persons hired, and the personnel
placement service does not have any responsibility as an employer.a company
that seeks to hire them and to be their sole employer.
(14) "Professional employer organization" or "PEO" means a Professional
employer organization or PEO. – A person that offers professional employer
services and services. This term includes "staff leasing services companies",
"employee leasing companies", "staff leasing companies", and "administrative
employers" staff leasing services companies, employee leasing companies,
staff leasing companies, and administrative employers who offer or propose
to offer professional employer services in this State.
(15) "Professional employer organization group" or "PEO group" means a
Professional employer organization group or PEO group. – A combination of
professional employer organizations that operates under a group license issued
under this Article or is otherwise subject to group licensure requirements
under G.S. 58-89A-35(b).
(16) "Professional employer services" means an Professional employer services. –
An arrangement by which employees of a licensee are assigned to work at a
client company and in which employment responsibilities are in fact shared
by the licensee and the client company in accordance with G.S. 58-89A-100,
and the employee's assignment is intended to be of a long-term or continuing
nature, rather than temporary or seasonal in nature. "Professional employer
services" This term does not include services that provide temporary
employees or independent contractors, a personnel placement service,
managed services, payroll services that do not involve employee staffing or
leasing, the sharing of employees by commonly owned companies within the
meaning of section 414(b) and (c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, Code, or similar groups that do not meet the requirements of this
subdivision.
(16d) "Tangible net worth" means the difference between total tangible assets and
total liabilities. For purposes of this definition, tangible assets are physical
assets and do not include goodwill, patents, copyrights, intellectual property,
trademarks, and any other non-physical asset.
Page 62 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

(17) "Temporary employees" means persons Temporary employees. – Persons
employed under an arrangement by which an organization hires its own
employees and assigns them to a client company to support or supplement the
client's workforce in a special work situation, including:including any of the
following:
a. An employee absence;absence.
b. A temporary skill shortage;shortage.
c. A seasonal workload; orworkload.
d. A special assignment or project.
(18) "Working capital" means the Working capital. – The difference between
current assets and current liabilities."
SECTION 68.(b) G.S. 58-89A-50 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-89A-50. Surety bond; letter of credit; other deposits.
(a) An applicant for licensure shall file with the Commissioner a surety bond, or other
items as set forth in subsection (f) of this section, in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) for the benefit of the Commissioner. An applicant or licensee who does not have
positive working capital pursuant to G.S. 58-89A-60(b) shall file an additional surety bond bond,
or other items set forth in subsection (f) of this section section, equal to or in excess of the
applicant's or licensee's negative working capital.
(b) The surety bond required by this section shall be in a form acceptable to the
Commissioner, issued by an insurer authorized by the Commissioner to write surety business in
this State, and maintained in force while the license remains in effect or any obligations or
liabilities of the applicant, licensee licensee, or PEO previously licensed by in this State remain
outstanding.
(c) The surety bond required by this section may be exchanged or replaced with another
surety bond if (i) the surety bond applies to obligations and liabilities that arose during the period
of the original surety bond, (ii) the surety bond meets the requirements of this section, and (iii)
90 days' advance written notice is provided to the Commissioner.
(d) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-413, s. 11.2(b), effective October 1, 2013.
(e) Notice of cancellation or nonrenewal of the surety bond required by this section shall
be provided to the Commissioner in writing at least 45 days before cancellation or nonrenewal.
(e1) A surety bond may be cancelled by the issuer of the bond with respect to future
obligations or liabilities upon proper notice pursuant to this section and without regard to
approval or acceptance of the Commissioner.
(f) In lieu Instead of the surety bond required by this section, an applicant may submit to
the Commissioner an irrevocable letter of credit in a form acceptable to the Commissioner issued
by a financial institution, the deposits of which are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation, or may maintain on deposit with the Commissioner an amount equal to the amount
required under subsection (a) of this section in cash or in value of securities of the kind specified
in G.S. 58-5-20. An applicant that deposits securities under this subsection shall concurrently
deliver to the Commissioner a power of attorney, on a form prescribed by the Commissioner,
executed by its president or another officer, authorizing the sale or transfer of the securities for
any purpose provided for in this Article, including the payment of licensee liabilities.
(g) This section does not apply to persons who are licensed pursuant to the alternative
licensing procedures set forth in G.S. 58-89A-76 or to persons who are de minimis registrants
pursuant to G.S. 58-89A-75.
(h) The license of any a licensee that fails to provide and maintain a surety bond, letter
of credit, cash, or securities pursuant to this section shall be is automatically and immediately
suspended, and the licensee shall tender its license to the Commissioner within three days of
failure to satisfy this requirement."
SECTION 68.(c) G.S. 58-89A-60 reads as rewritten:
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 63

"§ 58-89A-60. License application.
(a) Every An applicant for licensure shall file with the Commissioner, on a form
prescribed by the Commissioner, the following information:
(1) The name, organizational structure, and date of organization of the applicant,
the addresses of the principal office and of all offices in this State, the name
of the contact person, the type of operations within in this State, and the
taxpayer or employer identification number.
(2) A list by jurisdiction of each name under which the applicant has operated in
the preceding five years, including any alternative names, names of
predecessors, and, if known, names of successor business entities. The list
required by this subdivision shall include includes the parent company name
and any trade name, trademark, or service mark of the applicant.
(3) A list of all officers, directors, and other controlling persons of the applicant,
their biographical information, including their education, management and
business experience, and an affidavit from each attesting to his or her good
moral character and management competence.
(4) The location of the business records of the applicant.
(5) An attestation, executed by the chief financial officer and chief executive
officer of the applicant, that the applicant is current as of the date the
application is submitted with respect to all of its obligations for payroll,
payroll-related taxes, workers' compensation insurance, and employee
benefits. If any such of these obligations are in dispute with a client as of the
date the application is submitted and the disputed amount is material when
considered in the context of the applicant's most recent audited financial
statement, then the applicant shall disclose the nature of the dispute causing
the obligations to be unpaid and the amount of money in controversy.
(6) Any other reasonable information the Commissioner deems considers
necessary to establish that the applicant and the officers applicant, officers,
and controlling persons are of good moral character, character and have
business integrity, have applicable educational and business experience, and
have financial responsibility.
(b) Every An applicant shall file with the Commissioner an audited financial statement,
prepared as of a date not more than 120 days before the date of application application, that
demonstrates that the applicant has a tangible net worth of not less than fifty thousand dollars
($50,000) and positive working capital. The applicant shall attach to the audited financial
statement a separate document signed by the applicant's chief executive and the chief financial
officer certifying that (i) each has reviewed the audited financial statement; (ii) based on each
signatory's knowledge, the audited financial statement does not contain any untrue or misleading
statement of material fact or and does not omit a fact with respect to the period covered by the
audited financial statement; and (iii) based on each signatory's knowledge, the audited financial
statement fairly presents in all material respects the financial condition of the applicant as of, and
for, the period presented in the audited financial statement.
Notwithstanding the requirements of this subsection, However, the Commissioner may, in
the Commissioner's discretion, accept an audited financial statement that has been prepared more
than 120 days before submission to the Commissioner if the Commissioner deems such considers
acceptance appropriate. The Commissioner may, in the Commissioner's discretion, impose
conditions upon such acceptance of audited financial statements prepared more than 120 days
prior to before submission.
The audited financial statement shall be prepared by an independent certified public
accountant licensed to practice in the jurisdiction in which such the accountant is located and
shall be without qualification as to the going concern status of the applicant. Persons applying
Page 64 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

for a professional employer organization group license may submit combined or consolidated
audited financial statements to meet the requirements of this section, provided that so long as the
combined or consolidated audited financial statement include[s] includes a combining or
consolidating balance sheet and statement of operations of each proposed member as
supplemental information to the combined or consolidated audited financial statement. An
applicant that does not have at least 12 months of operating history may meet the financial
requirements of this subsection by filing with the Commissioner financial statements that have
been reviewed by an independent certified public accountant and that have been prepared as of a
date not more than 90 days before the date of application.
(b1) The Commissioner may accept the audited financial statement of an applicant's parent
company, if the audited financial statement includes either a combining or consolidating balance
sheet, income statement, statement of changes in equity, and statement of cash flows as
supplemental information to the audited financial statement, the contents of which will allow
statement and if these documents allow the Commissioner to determine the financial condition
and financial responsibility of the applicant.
(b2) The Commissioner may accept the audited financial statement of an applicant's parent
company and consider the financial condition and financial responsibility of the parent company
in lieu instead of those of the applicant, if all of the following requirements are satisfied:
(1) The parent executes a guaranty agreement, in a form prescribed by the
Commissioner, for the guaranty of all obligations related to the applicant's
current and future client companies, including its obligations for payroll,
payroll-related taxes, workers' compensation insurance, and employee
benefits.
(2) The applicant files with the Commissioner documentation acceptable to the
Commissioner evidencing the parent's control.
(3) The applicant submits an audited financial statement that meets the
requirements of subsection (b1) of this section that allows the Commissioner
to determine the financial condition and financial responsibility of the parent
and the applicant.
(c) Every An applicant shall submit to the Commissioner the application fee pursuant to
G.S. 58-89A-65.
(d) Every An applicant shall furnish the Commissioner a complete set of fingerprints of
each officer, director, and controlling person in a form prescribed by the Commissioner. Each set
of fingerprints shall be certified by an authorized law enforcement officer.
Upon request by the Department, the State Bureau of Investigation shall provide to the
Department from the State and National Repositories of Criminal Histories the criminal history
of any an applicant and the officer, director, and controlling person of any an applicant. Along
with the request, the Department shall provide to the State Bureau of Investigation the
fingerprints of the person that is the subject of the request, a form signed by the person that is the
subject of the request consenting to the criminal record check and use of fingerprints and other
identifying information required by the State and National Repositories, and any additional
information required by the State Bureau of Investigation. Bureau. The person's fingerprints shall
be used by the State Bureau of Investigation for a search of the State's criminal history record
file, and the State Bureau of Investigation may forward a set of fingerprints to the Federal Bureau
of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. The Department shall keep all
information obtained pursuant to this subsection confidential. The State Bureau of Investigation
may charge a fee to offset the cost incurred by it to conduct a criminal record check under this
section. subsection. The fee shall not exceed the actual cost of locating, editing, researching, and
retrieving the information.
In the event that If an applicant has secured a professional employer organization license in
another state in which the professional employer organization's controlling persons have
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 65

completed a criminal background investigation within 12 months of this application, a certified
copy of the report from the appropriate authority of that state may satisfy satisfies the requirement
of this subsection. This subsection also applies to a change in the officers, directors, and other
controlling persons of professional employer organizations and professional employer
organization groups licensed under this Article. For purposes of investigation under this
subsection, the Commissioner shall have has all the power conferred by G.S. 58-2-50 and other
applicable provisions of this Chapter.
(e) An application for licensure of a professional employer organization group shall
contain the information and submissions required by this section for each member of the group.
(f) No application is complete until the Commissioner has received all information and
submissions required under subsections (a) through (e) of this section. Subsections (a) through
(e) of this section do not apply to persons who are licensed pursuant to the alternative licensing
procedures set forth in G.S. 58-89A-76.
(g) Repealed by Session Laws 2025-45, s. 4(d), effective July 1, 2025.
(g1) The Commissioner may deny the license of an applicant under this Article if the
Commissioner finds any of the following:
(1) That an An officer, director, or other controlling person has:of the applicant
has committed any of the following acts or omissions:
a. Not met the requirements of G.S. 58-89A-40.
b. Made any untrue material statement or omitted any material
information regarding their background or experience.
c. Violated, or failed to comply with, any professional employer services
law or any rule or order of the Commissioner or of any other State
official or State agency responsible for the regulation of any aspect of
the applicant's business.
d. Obtained or attempted to obtain the license through misrepresentation
or fraud.
e. Been Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, been convicted of a felony.
f. Been found in a final judgment or administrative proceeding to have
committed fraud or an unfair trade practice.
g. Been an officer, director, or other controlling person in another
professional employer organization that has had its license or
registration suspended, terminated, or revoked by any state.
(2) That the The applicant is not current with respect to all of its obligations for
payroll, payroll-related taxes, workers' compensation insurance, and
employee benefits and the applicant has failed to satisfy the Commissioner as
to the reasons why.
(3) That the applicant does not possess:
a. A tangible net worth of not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
b. Positive working capital, or in lieu of positive working capital,
substitute security as provided under G.S. 58-89A-50(a).
(4) That the The applicant has not provided evidence satisfactory to the
Commissioner of financial responsibility.
(5) That the The applicant has failed to satisfy the requirements of
G.S. 58-89A-50.G.S. 58-89A-50.
(6) That a A ground upon which the Commissioner could take disciplinary action
against a licensee or other person subject to licensure requirements pursuant
to G.S. 58-89A-155 applies to the applicant.
(h) If the Commissioner finds that the applicant has not fully met the requirements for
licensure, the Commissioner shall refuse to issue the license and shall notify the applicant in
writing of the denial, stating the grounds for the denial. To obtain a review to determine the
Page 66 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

reasonableness of the Commissioner's denial, the applicant shall make written demand upon the
Commissioner within 30 days after notice is given under G.S. 150B-38(c). The review shall be
completed without undue delay, and the applicant shall be notified promptly in writing as to the
outcome of the review. If the applicant disagrees with the outcome of the review and seeks a
hearing, under Article 3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, on the outcome of the review,
the applicant shall make a written demand upon the Commissioner for the hearing within 30 days
after notice of the outcome of the review is given under G.S. 150B-38(c).
(i) Removal, demotion, or discharge of an officer, director, or other controlling person
in response to an order of the Commissioner of the alleged unsuitability of that person individual
is an affirmative defense to any claim by that individual based on the removal, demotion, or
discharge.
(j) The Commissioner may, in the Commissioner's discretion, waive the required
evaluation of an officer, director director, or controlling person if that officer, director director,
or controlling person has been evaluated previously under this Article.
(k) After denial, suspension, or termination of a license, and before issuing a new license
or reinstating a license, the Commissioner shall review and consider:consider both of the
following:
(1) The extent to which the applicant or licensee has adequately corrected any
problems; andproblems.
(2) Whether the applicant or licensee has demonstrated that the applicant or
licensee had has exercised due diligence to avoid the reason or reasons for the
denial denial, suspension, or termination.
The applicant or licensee bears the burden of proof with respect to subdivisions (1) and (2)
of this subsection."
SECTION 68.(d) This section is effective when it becomes law.
SECTION 69.(a) G.S. 93B-15.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 93B-15.3. Licensure recognition for individuals licensed in neighboring states.
(a) Applicability. – This section applies to the licensure of individuals by all occupational
licensing boards and State agency licensing boards except as provided in this subsection. This
section shall not apply to:the following:
(1) Licensure of any healthcare practitioner Healthcare practitioners licensed
under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
(2) Architects licensed under Chapter 83A of the General Statutes.
(3) Certified public accountants licensed under Chapter 93 of the General
Statutes.
(4) Engineers licensed under Chapter 89C of the General Statutes.
(5) Veterinarians licensed, or veterinary technicians registered, under Article 11
of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
(6) Admission to the practice of law or licensure as an attorney Attorneys
admitted to practice law or licensed under Chapter 84 of the General Statutes.
(7) Licensure of any practitioner Practitioners licensed by the North Carolina
Pesticide Board under Article 52 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.
(8) Licensure of any practitioner Practitioners licensed by the North Carolina
Structural Pest Control Committee under Article 4C of Chapter 106 of the
General Statutes.
(9) Dealers, salesmen, issuers, investment advisors, advisers, investment advisor
adviser representatives, and athlete agents under Chapters 78A, 78C, and 78D
of the General Statutes.
(10) Certification of any practitioner Practitioners certified by the North Carolina
On-Site Wastewater Contractors and Inspectors Certification Board under
Article 5 of Chapter 90A of the General Statutes.
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 67

(11) Licensure of any new motor vehicle dealer, used motor vehicle dealer, motor
Motor vehicle sales representative, representatives, manufacturer, factory
branch, factory representative, representatives, distributor, distributor branch,
distributor representative, representatives, or wholesaler and other individuals
licensed under Article 12 of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes.
(12) Insurance producers, adjusters, appraisers, bail bondsmen, runners, and other
individuals licensed under Chapter 58 of the General Statutes.
(b) Licensure Recognition. – Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an
occupational licensing board or a State agency licensing board subject to this section shall issue
a license, certification, or registration to any an applicant who establishes residence in this State
and satisfies all of the following conditions:
(1) The applicant is currently licensed, certified, or registered in Georgia, South
Carolina, Tennessee, Virginia, or West Virginia in the discipline applied for
in this State at the same or substantially equivalent practice level, as
determined by the occupational licensing board or State agency licensing
board.
(2) The applicant has been licensed, certified, or registered in one or more of the
states listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection for at least one year.
(3) The applicant has passed an examination required for the license, certification,
or registration in the jurisdiction in which the applicant holds a current license,
certification, or registration, if an examination was required.
(4) The applicant is in good standing in all jurisdictions within the United States
in which the applicant holds or has ever held a license, certification, or
registration in the profession for which the applicant is seeking licensure,
certification, or registration in this State.
(5) The applicant has not voluntarily surrendered a license, certification, or
registration or had a license, certification, or registration revoked in any
jurisdiction within in the United States as a result of unprofessional conduct
related to the profession for which the applicant is seeking licensure,
certification, or registration in this State.
(6) The applicant demonstrates competency in the profession through methods
determined by the board, which board. Demonstrating competency may
include having met the minimum education, clinical supervision, or work
experience requirements in effect in the originating state at the time the
applicant obtained the license, certification, or registration from that state.
(7) The applicant does not have any active or pending disciplinary actions from
an occupational licensing board or agency in another jurisdiction within in the
United States and, if applicable, the occupational licensing board or State
agency licensing board has completed verification under subsection (c) of this
section.
(8) The applicant does not have a disqualifying criminal history record, as
determined by the occupational licensing board or State agency licensing
board under G.S. 93B-8.1 and related provisions of law.
(9) The applicant has paid all applicable fees, including fees for application
processing, license issuance, verification of credentials, and background
checks.
(c) Prior Disciplinary Actions. – If the applicant has any prior resolved disciplinary
actions from an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board at the time of
application, the occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board to which the
applicant is applying shall determine and verify that the disciplinary action is resolved and, if
applicable, corrective action has been taken. If a disciplinary action is pending in another
Page 68 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857

jurisdiction, an the occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board shall suspend
the application process for any license, certificate, or registration under this section until the
disciplinary action has been resolved.
(d) Required Information. – Each occupational licensing board or State agency licensing
board shall publish a document that lists the specific criteria or requirements for licensure,
certification, or registration by the board under this section and any necessary documentation
needed for satisfying the requirements. The information required by this subsection shall be
published on the occupational licensing board's or State agency licensing board's website.
(e) Effect on Other Agreements. – Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent
any prevents an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board in this State from
entering into a reciprocity agreement with another jurisdiction or to invalidate any invalidates an
existing reciprocity agreement between any an occupational licensing board or State agency
licensing board in this State and another jurisdiction.
(f) Scope of License. – Any A license, certification, or registration granted by an
occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board to any applicant under this section
shall be is valid only in this State and does not extend validity to other jurisdictions, including
through an interstate compact, unless otherwise provided by law or interstate agreement.
(g) Rights and Obligations. – Any An individual who is licensed, certified, or registered
under this section shall be is entitled to the same rights and subject to the same obligations as
required of an individual who was licensed, certified, or registered by an occupational licensing
board or State agency licensing board in this State under any other provision of law.
(h) Alternative Pathway. – Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit prohibits
an individual from proceeding under the existing licensure, certification, or registration
requirements established by an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board in
this State."
SECTION 69.(b) G.S. 93B-15.3(a)(12), as enacted by subsection (a) of this section,
is retroactively effective October 1, 2025, and applies to licensure applications submitted on or
after that date. The remainder of this section is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 857 Session Law 2026-48 Page 69

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 70. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective October 1,
2026.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 1st day of July, 2026.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
s/ Josh Stein
Governor
Approved 9:46 a.m. this 7th day of July, 2026
Page 70 Session Law 2026-48 Senate Bill 857